Nebraska, session 109, LB264.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. The State Treasurer shall transfer $8,250,000 from the State
Insurance Fund to the General Fund before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 2. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Flexible
Spending Fund — Medical to the General Fund before June 30, 2025, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 3. The State Treasurer shall transfer $125,000 from the Resource
Recovery Fund to the General Fund before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 4. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,500,000 from the State
Recreation Road Fund to the State Park Cash Revolving Fund before June 30,
2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 5. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Youth Outdoor Education Innovation Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before July 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 6. The State Treasurer shall transfer $25,500,000 from the Military
Installation Development and Support Fund to the Site and Building Development
Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 7. The State Treasurer shall transfer $800,000 from the Flexible
Spending Fund — Medical to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 8. The State Treasurer shall transfer $4,500,000 from the Site and
Building Development Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 9. The State Treasurer shall transfer $32,700,000 from the Water
Recreation Enhancement Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
-1-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
Sec. 10. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Economic Development Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 11. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Intern Nebraska Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 12. The State Treasurer shall transfer $15,000,000 from the Economic
Recovery Contingency Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 13. The State Treasurer shall transfer $4,400,000 from the Jobs and
Economic Development Initiative Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 14. The State Treasurer shall transfer $5,500,000 from the Vehicle
Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund to the
General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 15. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,500,000 from the State
Recreation Road Fund to the State Park Cash Revolving Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 16. The State Treasurer shall transfer $5,000,000 from the Economic
Recovery Contingency Fund to the State Park Cash Revolving Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 17. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the State
Visitors Promotion Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 18. The State Treasurer shall transfer $4,000,000 from the Motor
Carrier Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund to the General Fund on
or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 19. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the Financial
Institution Assessment Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 20. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Customized Job Training Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 21. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 22. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,250,000 from the Nebraska
Training and Support Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 23. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,500,000 from the
Employment Security Special Contingent Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 24. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Workforce
Development Program Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 25. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Unclaimed
Property Trust Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 26. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Records
Management Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
-2-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 27. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Department
of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 28. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Treasury
Management Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 29. The State Treasurer shall transfer $400,000 from the Engineers
and Architects Regulation Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 30. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the
Department of Banking and Finance Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on
or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 31. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Nuclear and Hydrogen Development Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 32. The State Treasurer shall transfer $200,000 from the Sector
Partnership Program Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 33. The State Treasurer shall transfer $150,000 from the Real
Property Appraiser Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 34. The State Treasurer shall transfer $75,000 from the Nebraska Job
Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 35. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000 from the Appraisal
Management Company Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 36. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000 from the Historical
Society Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30,
2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 37. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000 from the Contractor
and Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund to the General
Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 38. The State Treasurer shall transfer $10,000 from the Support
Nebraska History Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 39. The State Treasurer shall transfer $26,243 from the Public
Service Commission Pipeline Regulation Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 40. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
211 Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30,
2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 41. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Lead-Based Paint Hazard Control Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 42. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Biotechnology Development Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 43. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund to the General Fund on or
after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts
-3-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 44. The State Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance of the
Nebraska Competitive Telephone Marketplace Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 45. The State Treasurer shall transfer $76,156 from the Nebraska
Legislative Shared Information System Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 46. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,224,000 from the Health
and Human Services Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 47. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000 from the Charitable
Gaming Operations Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 48. The State Treasurer shall transfer $4,000,000 from the Lead
Service Line Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 49. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Community
College State Dependents Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 50. The State Treasurer shall transfer $750,000 from the
Compensation Court Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 51. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,350,000 from the Trail
Development and Maintenance Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 52. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Prison
Overcrowding Contingency Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 53. The State Treasurer shall transfer $400,000 from the Shovel-
Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 54. The State Treasurer shall transfer $8,000,000 from the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but
before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 55. The State Treasurer shall transfer $750,000 from the Inland Port
Authority Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June
30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 56. The State Treasurer shall transfer $375,000 from the State
Department of Education Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 57. The State Treasurer shall transfer $375,000 from the Mechanical
Safety Inspection Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 58. The State Treasurer shall transfer $250,000 from the Motor
Carrier Division Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 59. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,850,000 from the
Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund to the General Fund on or
after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 60. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the
-4-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 61. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,500,000 from the Surface
Water Irrigation Infrastructure Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 62. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Nebraska
Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 63. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the Racetrack
Gaming Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30,
2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 64. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Carrier
Enforcement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 65. The State Treasurer shall transfer $250,000 from the Nebraska
State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 66. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 67. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,500,000 from the Civic and
Community Center Financing Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 68. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the State
Energy Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June
30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 69. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,250,000 from the
Governor's Emergency Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 70. The State Treasurer shall transfer $200,000 from the Engineering
Plan Review Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 71. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund to the Water Resources Cash Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 72. The State Treasurer shall transfer $8,000,000 from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 73. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund to the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund on or
after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 74. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the Workforce
Development Program Cash Fund to the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund on or
after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 75. The State Treasurer shall transfer $250,000 from the Marijuana
and Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund to the Department of
Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund on or after the operative date
of this section, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 76. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the Community
College Gap Assistance Program Fund to the Education Future Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
-5-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 77. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,700,000 from the Nebraska
Education Improvement Fund to the Education Future Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 78. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the
Certification Fund to the Education Future Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 79. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000 from the Tuition
Recovery Cash Fund to the Education Future Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 80. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000 from the Private
Postsecondary Career Schools Cash Fund to the Education Future Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 81. The State Treasurer shall transfer $800,000 from the State
Department of Education Cash Fund to the Education Future Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 82. The State Treasurer shall transfer $50,000 from the Expanded
Learning Opportunity Grant Fund to the Education Future Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 83. The State Treasurer shall transfer $50,000,000 from the Nebraska
Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund to the Nebraska Transformational Project Fund on
or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 84. The State Treasurer shall transfer $50,000,000 from the Nebraska
Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund to the Nebraska Transformational Project Fund on
or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 85. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,250,000 from the Nebraska
Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 86. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,250,000 from the Nebraska
Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 87. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund to the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund on or
after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 88. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 89. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Charitable
Gaming Operations Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before
June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 90. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,500,000 from the Vehicle
Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund to the
General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 91. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Motor
Carrier Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund to the General Fund on
or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 92. The State Treasurer shall transfer $250,000 from the Department
of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 93. The State Treasurer shall transfer $5,000,000 from the Economic
Recovery Contingency Fund to the State Park Cash Revolving Fund on or after
-6-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 94. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the State
Visitors Promotion Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but
before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 95. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the ImagiNE
Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but
before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 96. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the Records
Management Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before
June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 97. The State Treasurer shall transfer $375,000 from the State
Department of Education Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026,
but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 98. The State Treasurer shall transfer $750,000 from the Department
of Banking and Finance Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 99. The State Treasurer shall transfer $375,000 from the Mechanical
Safety Inspection Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before
June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 100. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Nebraska
Training and Support Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026,
but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 101. The State Treasurer shall transfer $12,500,000 from the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 102. The State Treasurer shall transfer $250,000 from the Motor
Carrier Division Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but
before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 103. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,470,000 from the Health
and Human Services Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but
before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 104. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the
Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund to the General Fund on or
after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 105. The State Treasurer shall transfer $4,500,000 from the
Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 106. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,500,000 from the Surface
Water Irrigation Infrastructure Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 107. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Nebraska
Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 108. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the
Racetrack Gaming Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before
June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 109. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Carrier
Enforcement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before
June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
-7-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
Sec. 110. The State Treasurer shall transfer $250,000 from the Nebraska
State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 111. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after
July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 112. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 from the Building
Renewal Allocation Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but
before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 113. The State Treasurer shall transfer $1,500,000 from the Civic
and Community Center Financing Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 114. The State Treasurer shall transfer $500,000 from the State
Energy Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before June
30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 115. The State Treasurer shall transfer $200,000 from the
Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026,
but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 116. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the Motor
Carrier Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund to the Department of
Motor Vehicles Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 117. The State Treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the Motor
Carrier Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund to the Department of
Motor Vehicles Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 118. The State Treasurer shall transfer $7,500,000 from the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund to the Operator's License Services
System Replacement and Maintenance Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 119. The State Treasurer shall transfer $6,000,000 from the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund to the Operator's License Services
System Replacement and Maintenance Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before
June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 120. Section 2-1577, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1577 (1) There is hereby created the Nebraska Soil and Water
Conservation Fund to be administered by the department. The State Treasurer
shall credit to the fund such money as is (a) transferred appropriated to the
fund by the Legislature, (b) paid to the state as fees, deposits, payments, and
repayments relating to the fund, both principal and interest, and (c) donated
as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or private
entities. Funds made available by any agency of the United States may also be
credited to such fund if so directed by such agency.
(2) The money in the fund shall not be subject to any fiscal-year
limitation or lapse provision of unexpended balance at the end of any such
fiscal year or biennium. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(3) The Department of Administrative Services shall establish a subaccount
within the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund for the accounting of any
money transferred to the fund from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund. Any
money transferred from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund to the Nebraska
Soil and Water Conservation Fund shall be expended in accordance with section
81-15,168.
(4) (3) Any money in the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 121. Section 8-604, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-604 (1) The Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall be used solely for the purposes of administering and
enforcing the laws specified in section 8-601, except that transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(2) Any money in the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund fund
-8-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 122. Section 9-1,101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
9-1,101 (1) The Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City Lottery
Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act,
the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, and section 9-701 shall be
administered and enforced by the Charitable Gaming Division of the Department
of Revenue, which division is hereby created. The Department of Revenue shall
make annual reports to the Governor, Legislature, Auditor of Public Accounts,
and Attorney General on all tax revenue received, expenses incurred, and other
activities relating to the administration and enforcement of such acts. The
report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(2) The Charitable Gaming Operations Fund is hereby created. Any money in
the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.
(3)(a) Forty percent of the taxes collected pursuant to sections 9-239,
9-344, 9-429, and 9-648 shall be available to the Charitable Gaming Division
for administering and enforcing the acts listed in subsection (1) of this
section and providing administrative support for the Nebraska Commission on
Problem Gambling. The remaining sixty percent shall be transferred to the
General Fund. Any portion of the forty percent not used by the division in the
administration and enforcement of such acts and section shall be distributed as
provided in this subsection.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2026 2025, on or before the
last day of the last month of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer shall
transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the Charitable Gaming Operations
Fund to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund.
(c) Any money remaining in the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund after the
transfer pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection not used by the
Charitable Gaming Division in its administration and enforcement duties
pursuant to this section may be transferred to the General Fund and the
Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall employ investigators who shall be vested
with the authority and power of a law enforcement officer to carry out the laws
of this state administered by the Tax Commissioner or the Department of Revenue
and to enforce sections 28-1101 to 28-1117 relating to possession of a gambling
device. For purposes of enforcing sections 28-1101 to 28-1117, the authority of
the investigators shall be limited to investigating possession of a gambling
device, notifying local law enforcement authorities, and reporting suspected
violations to the county attorney for prosecution.
(5) The Charitable Gaming Division may charge a fee for publications and
listings it produces. The fee shall not exceed the cost of publication and
distribution of such items. The division may also charge a fee for making a
copy of any record in its possession equal to the actual cost per page. The
division shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Charitable Gaming Operations Fund.
(6) The taxes collected and available to the Charitable Gaming Division
pursuant to section 77-3012 shall be used by the division for enforcement of
the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act and maintenance of the central server
established pursuant to section 77-3013.
(7) For administrative purposes only, the Nebraska Commission on Problem
Gambling shall be located within the Charitable Gaming Division. The division
shall provide office space, furniture, equipment, and stationery and other
necessary supplies for the commission. Commission staff shall be appointed,
supervised, and terminated by the director of the Gamblers Assistance Program
pursuant to section 9-1004.
Sec. 123. Section 9-1107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
9-1107 The Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of all license, application, and other fees
collected under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. The fund shall be used for
administration of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. Transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in
the Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 124. Section 13-3315, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
13-3315 The Inland Port Authority Fund is created. The fund shall be used
by the State Treasurer to carry out section 13-3314. The fund shall consist of
transfers by the Legislature and any federal funds which may become available
for the purposes of the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Inland Port Authority Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
-9-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
Sec. 125. Section 37-351, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-351 There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Nebraska Outdoor
Recreation Development Cash Fund. The fund shall contain the money received
pursuant to section 77-2602 and any funds donated as gifts, bequests, or other
contributions to such fund from public or private entities. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature
through June 30, 2011. Any money in the Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 126. Section 37-1017, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
37-1017 The Trail Development and Maintenance Fund is hereby created. The
fund shall consist of transfers at the direction of the Legislature and any
gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or private
entities. The Game and Parks Commission shall administer the fund to provide
grants to natural resources districts to assist in completing the Missouri-
Pacific trail between the cities of Lincoln and Omaha. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Trail Development and Maintenance Fund fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 127. Section 37-1804, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
37-1804 (1) The Water Recreation Enhancement Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the Game and Parks Commission. The State Treasurer
shall credit to the fund any money transferred to the fund by the Legislature
and such donations, gifts, bequests, or other money received from any federal
or state agency or public or private source. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the fund shall be used for water and
recreational projects pursuant to the Water Recreation Enhancement Act or for
campground expansion projects, road repair projects, and general infrastructure
and maintenance projects, with two-thirds used for projects at the Lewis and
Clark State Recreation Area and one-third used for projects at the Lake
McConaughy State Recreation Area. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Water
Recreation Enhancement Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any Prior to October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the fund. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of
money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) For any amount credited to the Water Recreation Enhancement Fund from
a source other than a transfer authorized by the Legislature, the State
Treasurer shall transfer an equal amount from the Water Recreation Enhancement
Fund to the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund at the end of the
fiscal year in which such funds were credited, on such dates as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services to be used pursuant to section 61-405.
Sec. 128. Section 39-1390, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
39-1390 The State Recreation Road Fund is created. The money in the fund
shall be transferred by the State Treasurer, on the first day of each month, to
the department and shall be expended by the Director-State Engineer with the
approval of the Governor for construction and maintenance of dustless-surface
roads to be designated as state recreation roads as provided in this section,
except that (1) transfers may be made from the fund to the State Park Cash
Revolving Fund at the direction of the Legislature through July 31, 2016, and
(2) if the balance in the State Recreation Road Fund exceeds fourteen million
dollars on the first day of each month, the State Treasurer shall transfer the
amount greater than fourteen million dollars to the Game and Parks State Park
Improvement and Maintenance Fund. Except as to roads under contract as of March
15, 1972, those roads, excluding state highways, giving direct and immediate
access to or located within state parks, state recreation areas, or other
recreational or historical areas, shall be eligible for designation as state
recreation roads. Such eligibility shall be determined by the Game and Parks
Commission and certified to the Director-State Engineer, who shall, after
receiving such certification, be authorized to commence construction on such
recreation roads as funds are available. In addition, those roads, excluding
state highways, giving direct and immediate access to a state veteran cemetery
are state recreation roads. After construction of such roads they shall be
shown on the map provided by section 39-1311. Preference in construction shall
be based on existing or potential traffic use by other than local residents.
Unless the State Highway Commission otherwise recommends, such roads upon
completion of construction shall be incorporated into the state highway system.
If such a road is not incorporated into the state highway system, the
department and the county within which such road is located shall enter into a
maintenance agreement establishing the responsibility for maintenance of the
road, the maintenance standards to be met, and the responsibility for
maintenance costs. Any money in the State Recreation Road Fund available for
-10-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 129. Section 39-2803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-2803 (1) The Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the department and shall be used for purposes of
sections 39-2803 to 39-2807. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Transportation
Infrastructure Bank Fund fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings from investment of
money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund shall consist of money
transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund pursuant to section 84-612 and any other
money as determined by the Legislature.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that additional fuel tax revenue
generated by Laws 2015, LB610, shall be transferred from the Roads Operations
Cash Fund to the Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund. Transfers shall be
initiated each fiscal year by the State Treasurer following certification of
revenue receipts by the Director-State Engineer from July 1, 2016, through June
2033. Transferred funds shall be used for purposes of sections 39-2803 to
39-2807.
Sec. 130. Section 39-2806, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
39-2806 The Economic Opportunity Program is created. The Department of
Transportation shall administer the program in consultation with the Department
of Economic Development using funds from the Transportation Infrastructure Bank
Fund, except that no more than twenty million dollars shall be expended for
this program. The purpose of the program is to finance transportation
improvements to attract and support new businesses and business expansions by
successfully connecting such businesses to Nebraska’s multimodal transportation
network and to increase employment, create high-quality jobs, increase business
investment, and revitalize rural and other distressed areas of the state. The
Department of Transportation shall develop the program, including the
application process, criteria for providing funding, matching requirements, and
provisions for recapturing funds awarded for projects with unmet obligations,
in consultation with statewide associations representing municipal and county
officials, economic developers, and the Department of Economic Development. No
project shall be approved through the Economic Opportunity Program without an
economic impact analysis proving positive economic impact. The Economic
Opportunity Program terminates June 30, 2025, with all projects with approved
applications or approved letters of interest as of May 1, 2025, authorized for
continued funding from the program until expended or no longer needed. No new
letters of interest shall be received by the Department of Transportation after
May 1, 2025. The details of the program shall be presented to the
Appropriations Committee and the Transportation and Telecommunications
Committee of the Legislature on or before December 1, 2016.
Sec. 131. Section 39-2807, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-2807 Sections 39-2803 to 39-2805 and 39-2807 terminate on June 30,
2033. The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated funds remaining in the
Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund on such date to the Cash Reserve Fund.
Sec. 132. Section 46-1,164, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
46-1,164 There is hereby created the Surface Water Irrigation
Infrastructure Fund to be administered by the Department of Natural Resources.
The fund shall be used to provide grants in accordance with section 46-1,165 to
irrigation districts. There shall be a one-time transfer of fifty million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Surface Water Irrigation
Infrastructure Fund to carry out the purposes of section 46-1,165. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Surface Water Irrigation Infrastructure Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, any investment
Investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund. Beginning July 1, 2027, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the Surface Water Irrigation Infrastructure Fund shall
be credited to the fund.
Sec. 133. Section 48-1,116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1,116 The Compensation Court Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund
shall be used to aid in providing for the expense of administering the Nebraska
Workers' Compensation Act and the payment of the salaries and expenses of the
personnel of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court.
All fees received pursuant to sections 48-120, 48-120.02, 48-138, 48-139,
48-145.04, and 48-165 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Compensation Court Cash Fund. The fund shall also consist of amounts
credited to the fund pursuant to sections 48-1,113, 48-1,114, and 77-912. The
State Treasurer may receive and credit to the fund any money which may at any
time be contributed to the state or the fund by the federal government or any
-11-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
agency thereof to which the state may be or become entitled under any act of
Congress or otherwise by reason of any payment made from the fund.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature until June 30, 2026. Any money in the Compensation Court
Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 134. Section 48-3405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-3405 (1) The Sector Partnership Program Fund is created. The fund shall
be administered by the Department of Labor. The fund shall be used to pursue
sector partnership activities, including, but not limited to, labor
availability and skills gap studies by the Department of Labor and the
Department of Economic Development pursuant to the Sector Partnership Program
Act. The fund may also be used for administrative costs of the Department of
Labor and the Department of Economic Development associated with sector
partnership activities.
(2) The fund shall consist of such money as is: (a) Transferred to the
fund from the Job Training Cash Fund and the Nebraska Training and Support Cash
Fund; (b) otherwise appropriated to the fund by the Legislature; (c) donated as
gifts, bequests, or other contributions to the fund from public or private
entities; and (d) made available by any department or agency of the United
States if so directed by such department or agency. Transfers may be made from
the Sector Partnership Program Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Sector Partnership Program Fund fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 135. Section 50-501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-501 (1) The Bioscience Steering Committee is created. The committee
shall consist of the chairperson of the Revenue Committee of the Legislature or
his or her designee, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee or his or
her designee, and three members of the Legislature selected by the Executive
Board of the Legislative Council. The executive board shall appoint a
chairperson and vice-chairperson of the committee.
(2) The committee shall conduct a study to measure the impact of the
bioscience economy in Nebraska and prepare a strategic plan for growing the
bioscience economy in Nebraska. The strategic plan shall report on any progress
or remaining work since the last study conducted on the bioscience industry.
The strategic plan shall further propose strategies for developing the
bioscience economy and shall include, but not be limited to, strategies to (a)
stimulate job growth in the fields of science, technology, and engineering
throughout Nebraska, (b) encourage individuals and organizations engaged in the
biotechnology businesses to locate and expand in Nebraska, (c) capture and
commercialize technology that is discovered and developed in Nebraska, (d) grow
Nebraska’s investment capital market and incentivize investment in life science
start-up companies, and (e) develop Nebraska’s biotechnology workforce in
cooperation with higher education institutions. The strategic plan shall
estimate the wealth and number of jobs generated from expanding the bioscience
economy.
(3) The committee, in consultation with the executive board, shall
commission a nonprofit corporation to provide research, analysis, and
recommendations to the committee for the development of the study and strategic
plan. The nonprofit corporation shall be incorporated pursuant to the Nebraska
Nonprofit Corporation Act, shall be organized exclusively for nonprofit
purposes within the meaning of section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code
as defined in section 49-801.01, shall be engaged in activities to facilitate
and promote the growth of life sciences within Nebraska, and shall be dedicated
to the development and growth of the bioscience economy.
(4) The committee shall prepare and present electronically to the
Legislature a statewide strategic plan for the bioscience economy during the
One Hundred Fifth Legislature, First Session, for consideration by the
Legislature.
(5)(a) The Biotechnology Development Cash Fund is created. The money in
the fund shall be used to commission the nonprofit corporation and provide
access to resources necessary for developing the study and strategic plan.
(b) The fund may receive gifts, bequests, grants, or other contributions
or donations from public or private entities. Transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Biotechnology Development Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(c) The Biotechnology Development Cash Fund terminates July 1, 2026.
Sec. 136. Section 55-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
55-901 (1) The Military Installation Development and Support Fund is
created. The fund shall be used to contribute to construction, development, or
support for any military installation, located in Nebraska, for purposes of
improving mission retention and recruitment; supporting the morale, health, and
mental wellness of military members and families; and growing the economic
impact of military installations in Nebraska. The Department of Veterans'
Affairs shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of transfers
authorized by the Legislature and any gifts, grants, or bequests from any
-12-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
source, including federal, state, public, and private sources, for such
purposes. Transfers may be made from the fund to the Site and Building
Development Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Military
Installation Development and Support Fund fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1,
2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
(2) The Military Installation Development and Support Fund may be used for
any project that directly supports any military installation located in
Nebraska.
(3) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall require a match of public or
private funding in an amount equal to or greater than one-half of the total
cost of any project described in subsection (2) of this section prior to
authorizing an expenditure from the fund.
(4) For purposes of this section, military installation means a base,
camp, post, station, yard, center, armory, or other activity under the
jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the Nebraska
Military Department.
Sec. 137. Section 57-1411, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1411 The Public Service Commission Pipeline Regulation Fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the commission. The fund shall be used by the
commission to carry out the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Public Service Commission Pipeline Regulation Fund fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 138. Section 60-3,201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,201 There is hereby created the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund.
Such fund shall be used by the Division of Motor Carrier Services of the
department to carry out the operations of the division including the
administration of titling and registering vehicles in interjurisdiction
commerce and its duties pursuant to section 66-1415. Transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in
the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 139. Section 60-3,201.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,201.01 (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall build and maintain
a new motor carrier services system for processing the issuance of vehicle
registrations pursuant to section 60-3,198 and the assessment of the motor fuel
tax under the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act. The Director of Motor
Vehicles shall designate an implementation date for the new system which date
is on or before July 1, 2025.
(2) The Motor Carrier Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of amounts credited under section 60-3,202. The
fund shall be used for the building, implementation, and maintenance of a new
motor carrier services system for processing the issuance of vehicle
registrations pursuant to section 60-3,198 and the assessment of the motor fuel
tax under the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act. Transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund or the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund at
the direction of the Legislature.
(3) Any money in the Motor Carrier Services System Replacement and
Maintenance Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General
Fund.
Sec. 140. Section 60-1505, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-1505 The Vehicle Title and Registration System Replacement and
Maintenance Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall be administered by the
Department of Motor Vehicles. Revenue credited to the fund shall include fees
collected by the department from participation in any multistate electronic
data security program, except as otherwise specifically provided by law, and
funds transferred as provided in section 60-3,186. The fund shall be used by
the department to pay for costs associated with the acquisition,
implementation, maintenance, support, upgrades, and replacement of the Vehicle
Title and Registration System. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Vehicle
Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 141. Section 60-1513, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-1513 The Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund is hereby created. The
fund shall be administered by the Director of Motor Vehicles. In addition to
money credited or remitted to the fund, the fund may also receive reimbursement
-13-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
from counties. The fund shall be used by the Department of Motor Vehicles to
carry out its duties as deemed necessary by the Director of Motor Vehicles,
except that transfers from the fund to the General Fund, the Operator's License
Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund, or the Vehicle Title and
Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund may be made at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Department of Motor Vehicles
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
The State Treasurer shall transfer five million three hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars from the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund to the Vehicle
Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund on or
before June 30, 2017, as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 142. Section 61-218, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-218 (1) The Water Resources Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the Department of Natural Resources. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(2) The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund such money as is (a)
transferred to the fund by the Legislature, (b) paid to the state as fees,
deposits, payments, and repayments relating to the fund, both principal and
interest, (c) donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund
from public or private entities, (d) made available by any department or agency
of the United States if so directed by such department or agency, (e)
transferred allocated pursuant to section 81-15,175, and (f) received by the
state for settlement of claims relating to interstate river compacts or
decrees.
(3)(a) The fund shall be expended by the department in any area that has
adopted an integrated management plan as provided in section 46-715.
(b) The fund shall be used in any such area:
(i) To aid management actions taken to reduce consumptive uses of water;
(ii) To enhance streamflows or ground water recharge;
(iii) For any other activity deemed necessary by the department in the
development and implementation of an integrated management plan;
(iv) For purposes of the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act; or
(v) For purposes of projects or proposals described in the grant
application as set forth in subdivision (2)(h) of section 81-15,175.
(c) To the extent funds are not expended pursuant to subdivision (b) of
this subsection, the department may conduct a statewide assessment of short-
term and long-term water management activities and funding needs to meet
statutory requirements in sections 46-713 to 46-718 and 46-739 and any
requirements of an interstate compact or decree or formal state contract or
agreement.
(d) The fund shall not be used to pay for administrative expenses or any
salaries for any political subdivision.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that three million three hundred
thousand dollars be transferred each fiscal year from the General Fund to the
Water Resources Cash Fund for FY2011-12 through FY2022-23, except that for
FY2012-13 it is the intent of the Legislature that four million seven hundred
thousand dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Water Resources
Cash Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Treasurer credit
any money received from any Republican River Compact settlement to the Water
Resources Cash Fund in the fiscal year in which it is received.
(5)(a) Expenditures from the Water Resources Cash Fund may be made to
natural resources districts eligible under subsection (3) of this section for
activities to either achieve a sustainable balance of consumptive water uses or
assure compliance with an interstate compact or decree or a formal state
contract or agreement and shall require a match of local funding in an amount
equal to or greater than forty percent of the total cost of carrying out the
eligible activity. The department shall, no later than August 1 of each year,
beginning in 2007, determine the amount of funding that will be made available
to natural resources districts from the Water Resources Cash Fund and notify
natural resources districts of this determination. The department shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations governing application for and use of the
Water Resources Cash Fund by natural resources districts. Such rules and
regulations shall, at a minimum, include the following components:
(i) Require an explanation of how the planned activity will achieve a
sustainable balance of consumptive water uses or will assure compliance with an
interstate compact or decree or a formal state contract or agreement as
required by section 46-715 and the controls, rules, and regulations designed to
carry out the activity; and
(ii) A schedule of implementation of the activity or its components,
including the local match as set forth in subdivision (5)(a) of this section.
(b) Any natural resources district that fails to implement and enforce its
controls, rules, and regulations as required by section 46-715 shall not be
eligible for funding from the Water Resources Cash Fund until it is determined
by the department that compliance with the provisions required by section
46-715 has been established.
(6) The Department of Natural Resources shall submit electronically an
-14-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
annual report to the Legislature no later than October 1 of each year,
beginning in the year 2007, that shall detail the use of the Water Resources
Cash Fund in the previous year. The report shall provide:
(a) Details regarding the use and cost of activities carried out by the
department; and
(b) Details regarding the use and cost of activities carried out by each
natural resources district that received funds from the Water Resources Cash
Fund.
(7)(a) Prior to the application deadline for fiscal year 2011-12, the
Department of Natural Resources shall apply for a grant of nine million nine
hundred thousand dollars from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund, to be paid
out in three annual installments of three million three hundred thousand
dollars. The purposes listed in the grant application shall be consistent with
the uses of the Water Resources Cash Fund provided in this section and shall be
used to aid management actions taken to reduce consumptive uses of water, to
enhance streamflows, to recharge ground water, or to support wildlife habitat
in any river basin determined to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713.
(b) If the application is granted, funds received from such grant shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Water Resources Cash Fund for
the purpose of supporting the projects set forth in the grant application. The
department shall include in its grant application documentation that the
Legislature has authorized a transfer of three million three hundred thousand
dollars from the General Fund into the Water Resources Cash Fund for each of
fiscal years 2011-12 and 2012-13 and has stated its intent to transfer three
million three hundred thousand dollars to the Water Resources Cash Fund for
fiscal year 2013-14.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department apply for an
additional three-year grant that would begin in fiscal year 2014-15, an
additional three-year grant from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund that
would begin in fiscal year 2017-18, and an additional three-year grant from the
Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund that would begin in fiscal year 2020-21 if
the criteria established in subsection (4) of section 81-15,175 are achieved.
(8) The department shall establish a subaccount within the Water Resources
Cash Fund for the accounting of all money received as a grant from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund as the result of an application made pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section. At the end of each calendar month, the
department shall calculate the amount of interest earnings accruing to the
subaccount and shall notify the State Treasurer who shall then transfer a like
amount from the Water Resources Cash Fund to the Nebraska Environmental Trust
Fund.
(9) Any funds transferred from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund to
the Water Resources Cash Fund shall be placed within the subaccount created
under subsection (8) of this section and expended in accordance with section
81-15,168.
(10) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million dollars from the Water
Resources Cash Fund to the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund as soon as
administratively possible after July 19, 2024, but before June 30, 2025, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 143. Section 61-222, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-222 The Water Sustainability Fund is created in the Department of
Natural Resources. The fund shall be used in accordance with the provisions
established in sections 2-1506 to 2-1513 and for costs directly related to the
administration of the fund. The Legislature shall not appropriate or transfer
money from the Water Sustainability Fund for any other purpose, except that
transfers may be made from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of
Natural Resources Cash Fund and as a one-time transfer to the General Fund as
described in this section.
The Water Sustainability Fund shall consist of money transferred to the
fund by the Legislature, other funds as appropriated by the Legislature, and
money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private
entities. Funds made available by any department or agency of the United States
may also be credited to the fund if so directed by such department or agency.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Prior to October 1, 2024, investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
It is the intent of the Legislature that twenty-one million dollars be
transferred from the General Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund in fiscal
year 2014-15 and that eleven million dollars be transferred from the General
Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund each fiscal year beginning in fiscal year
2015-16.
The Department of Administrative Services shall establish a subaccount
within the Water Sustainability Fund for the accounting of any money
transferred to the fund from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund. Any money
transferred from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund to the Water
Sustainability Fund shall be expended in accordance with section 81-15,168.
The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Natural
-15-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2021, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Natural
Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2021, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred thousand dollars from the
Water Sustainability Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2021, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Natural
Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2022, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Natural
Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2023, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 144. Section 61-305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-305 (1) The Perkins County Canal Project Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the Department of Natural Resources. The State
Treasurer shall credit to the fund any money transferred by the Legislature and
such grants, loans, donations, gifts, bequests, or other money received from
any federal or state agency or public or private source for use by the
department for the canal project. Any fees collected for water delivery may be
credited to the fund. Any money in the Perkins County Canal Project Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Prior to July 1, 2025, any Any investment earnings from
investment of money in the Perkins County Canal Project Fund shall be credited
to such fund, except that for fiscal years 2023-24 and , 2024-25, and 2025-26,
such investment earnings shall be credited as provided in section 84-622.
Beginning July 1, 2025, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2)(a) The department shall use the Perkins County Canal Project Fund to
identify the optimal route and purchase land for and develop, construct,
manage, and operate the Perkins County Canal as outlined by the South Platte
River Compact and to contract with an independent firm for the purposes of
completing a study of such canal. The study shall include, but may not be
limited to, the following:
(i) Costs of completion of a canal and adjoining reservoirs as outlined in
the South Platte River Compact;
(ii) A timeline for completion of a canal and adjoining reservoirs as
outlined in the South Platte River Compact;
(iii) A cost-effectiveness study examining alternatives, including
alternatives that may reduce environmental or financial impacts; and
(iv) The impacts of the canal on drinking water supplies for the cities of
Lincoln and Omaha.
(b) The department shall provide the findings of such study electronically
to the Clerk of the Legislature and present the findings at a public hearing
held by the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature on or before December
31, 2022.
Sec. 145. Section 61-405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-405 (1) The Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the Department of Natural Resources. The
State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any money transferred to the fund by
the Legislature and such donations, gifts, bequests, or other money received
from any federal or state agency or public or private source. The fund shall be
used for water and recreational projects pursuant to the Jobs and Economic
Development Initiative Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General
Fund, the Cash Reserve Fund, or the Roads Operations Cash Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Prior to October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund
shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) An amount, not to exceed twenty million dollars, shall be available
for site selection costs, feasibility and public water supply studies, and
flood mitigation costs of the Department of Natural Resources related to any
projects pursuant to the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Act. The
Department of Natural Resources shall, in cooperation with impacted
communities, including, but not limited to, any city of the primary class and
metropolitan utilities district, contract with an independent consultant to
conduct a study on the consequences of any lake located in the Lower Platte
River Basin to the public water supply of such communities. Such study shall
-16-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
consider all aspects of water quality, water quantity, and water
infrastructure, and any other issues necessary to protect the public water
supply, including the impact to future water supply opportunities to the
impacted communities.
(3) No funds shall be expended for any project, other than those
enumerated in subsection (2) of this section, from the Jobs and Economic
Development Initiative Fund unless the Director of Natural Resources certifies
to the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services that the Department of Natural Resources has conducted
any environmental, hydrological, or other feasibility studies the director
deems necessary to establish the feasibility of any projects pursuant to the
Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Act and that, based on the results of
such studies, the director has deemed the projects feasible.
Sec. 146. Section 66-2308, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-2308 (1) The Nuclear and Hydrogen Development Fund is created. The
department shall administer the fund to provide per diems and travel and
lodging reimbursement to members of the work group as provided under section
66-2305. The fund shall consist of money transferred by the Legislature.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred thousand dollars to
the fund from the General Fund as soon as administratively possible after May
27, 2023.
(2) The Nuclear and Hydrogen Development Fund terminates on July 31, 2028,
and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to
the General Fund.
Sec. 147. Section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-996 (1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created. The
fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to
subdivision (3) of section 68-995.
(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under subdivision
(2) of section 68-995 and then to provide for (a) services addressing the
health needs of adults and children under the Medical Assistance Act, including
filling service gaps, (b) providing system improvements, (c) providing
evidence-based early intervention home visitation programs, (d) providing
medical respite services, (e) translation and interpretation services, (f)
providing coverage for continuous glucose monitors as described in section
68-911, (g) providing other services sustaining access to care, (h) services
under the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program, (i) and providing grants pursuant to
the Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program, and (j) domestic
violence services, as determined by the Legislature. The fund shall only be
used for the purposes described in this section.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
Sec. 148. Section 68-1010, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
68-1010 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall contract
with, or provide a grant to, an eligible entity to implement a pilot program to
facilitate the transfer of patients with complex health needs from eligible
acute care hospitals to appropriate post-acute care settings, including
facilities that provide skilled nursing or long-term care.
(2) The purposes of the pilot program are to ensure that:
(a) Patients with complex health needs are able to access timely
transition from an acute care hospital to a post-acute care setting;
(b) Patients receive the appropriate type of care at the appropriate time
to best meet their needs; and
(c) Acute-care hospitals have available capacity to meet the needs of
patients.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Eligible acute care hospital means a facility that is not designated
as a critical access hospital by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services and must satisfactorily demonstrate to the eligible entity that it has
reached or exceeded eighty percent of available staffed capacity for adult
intensive-care-unit beds and acute care inpatient medical-surgical beds;
(b) Eligible entity means a nonprofit statewide association whose members
include eligible acute care hospitals; and
(c) Patient means a person who is medically stable and who the provider
believes, with a reasonable medical probability and in accordance with
recognized medical standards, is safe to be discharged or transferred and is
not expected to have his or her condition negatively impacted during, or as a
result of, the discharge or transfer.
(4) The eligible entity responsible for developing the pilot program
shall:
(a) Determine criteria to define patients with complex health needs;
(b) Develop a process for eligible acute care hospitals to determine
capacity and the manner and frequency of reporting changes in capacity;
(c) Develop a process to ensure funding is utilized for the purposes
described in this section and in compliance with all applicable state and
federal laws;
-17-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
(d) Include regular consultation with the department and representatives
of acute care hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, and nursing facilities;
and
(e) Include quarterly updates to the department.
(5) The pilot program may include direct payments to post-acute care
facilities that support care to patients with complex health needs.
(6) Funding utilized under the pilot program shall comply with all
medicaid and medicare reimbursement policies for skilled nursing facilities,
nursing facilities, and swing-bed hospitals.
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million dollars
from the General Fund to carry out this section. No more than two and one-half
percent of the contracted amount shall be used to administer the pilot program.
(8) The pilot program terminates on June 30, 2025. This section terminates
on June 30, 2025.
Sec. 149. Section 69-1317, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
69-1317 (a)(1)(i) (a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision,
all funds received under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act,
including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under section
69-1316, shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the Unclaimed Property
Trust Fund from which he or she shall make prompt payment of claims allowed
pursuant to the act and payment of any expenses related to unclaimed property.
All funds received under section 69-1307.05 shall be deposited by the State
Treasurer into the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall
make prompt payment of claims regarding such funds allowed pursuant to the act.
Transfers from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the General Fund may be
made at the direction of the Legislature. Before making the deposit he or she
shall record the name and last-known address of each person appearing from the
holders' reports to be entitled to the abandoned property, the name and last-
known address of each insured person or annuitant, and with respect to each
policy or contract listed in the report of a life insurance corporation, its
number, the name of the corporation, and the amount due. The record shall be
available for public inspection during business hours. The separate life
insurance corporation demutualization trust fund terminates on March 13, 2019,
and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to
the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund.
(ii) The record shall not be subject to public inspection or available for
copying, reproduction, or scrutiny by commercial or professional locators of
property presumed abandoned who charge any service or finders' fee until
twenty-four months after the names from the holders' reports have been
published or officially disclosed. Records concerning the social security
number, date of birth, and last-known address of an owner shall be treated as
confidential and subject to the same confidentiality as tax return information
held by the Department of Revenue, except that the Auditor of Public Accounts
shall have unrestricted access to such records.
(iii) A professional finders' fee shall be limited to ten percent of the
total dollar amount of the property presumed abandoned. To claim any such fee,
the finder shall disclose to the owner the nature, location, and value of the
property, provide notice of when such property was reported to the State
Treasurer, and provide notice that the property may be claimed by the owner
from the State Treasurer free of charge. To claim any such fee if the property
has not yet been abandoned, the finder shall disclose to the owner the nature,
location, and value of the property, provide notice of when such property will
be reported to the State Treasurer, if known, and provide notice that, upon
receipt of the property by the State Treasurer, such property may be claimed by
the owner from the State Treasurer free of charge.
(2)(i) (2) The unclaimed property records of the State Treasurer, the
unclaimed property reports of holders, and the information derived by an
unclaimed property examination or audit of the records of a person or otherwise
obtained by or communicated to the State Treasurer may be withheld from the
public. Any record or information that may be withheld under the laws of this
state or of the United States when in the possession of such a person may be
withheld when revealed or delivered to the State Treasurer. Any record or
information that is withheld under any law of another state when in the
possession of that other state may be withheld when revealed or delivered by
the other state to the State Treasurer.
(ii) Information withheld from the general public concerning any aspect of
unclaimed property shall only be disclosed to an apparent owner of the property
or to the escheat, unclaimed, or abandoned property administrators or officials
of another state if that other state accords substantially reciprocal
privileges to the State Treasurer.
(b)(1) (b) On or before November 1 of each year prior to 2026, the State
Treasurer shall transfer distribute any balance in excess of one million
dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent school fund.
(2) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2026 through 2035,
the State Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one million dollars
from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund as follows:
(i) The first one million dollars to the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund;
and
(ii) Any remaining balance to the permanent school fund.
(3) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2036, the State
Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one million dollars from the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent school fund.
-18-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
(c) Before making any deposit to the credit of the permanent school fund,
the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund, or the General Fund, the State Treasurer may
deduct any costs related to unclaimed property and place such funds in the
Unclaimed Property Cash Fund.
(d) The Unclaimed Property Cash Fund which is hereby created. Transfers
from the fund to the General Fund may be made at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 150. Section 71-5328, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-5328 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Department means the Department of Environment and Energy;
(b) Metropolitan utilities district means a district created pursuant to
section 14-2101; and
(c) Qualified labor training organization means any job training service
provider headquartered in the State of Nebraska with a demonstrated history of
providing workforce training relevant to the skilled labor necessary for the
removal and replacement of lead service lines.
(2) The Lead Service Line Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the department. The fund shall consist of funds transferred by
the Legislature. The fund shall be used for grants under subsection (3)
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Lead
Service Line Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) The department shall utilize not more than twenty percent of the money
in the Lead Service Line Cash Fund for the purpose of providing grants to
qualified labor training organizations for the following:
(a) Infrastructure expenditures necessary to establish a lead service line
training facility or for any expenditures necessary to establish a lead service
line training program; or
(b) Labor training or any educational programming expenditures necessary
to provide the proper trade skills necessary for laborers and plumbers to
replace lead service lines.
(3) (4) The department shall utilize all remaining money in the Lead
Service Line Cash Fund for the purpose of providing grants to metropolitan
utilities districts for the following:
(a) Removing and replacing lead service lines;
(b) Repaying debt incurred for any loan received by the metropolitan
utilities district for the purpose of replacing lead service lines, including
any loan or loans under the federal Drinking Water State Revolving Fund or any
other loan incurred specifically for the purpose of removing lead service
lines;
(c) Providing information to residents on the benefits of removing lead
service lines;
(d) Performing necessary construction, assessment, mapping, or any other
labor, management, or contracted services required for and associated with
removing and replacing lead service lines; or
(e) Acquiring any equipment, materials, or supplies necessary to replace
lead service lines.
(4) (5) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 151. Section 71-7608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-7608 (1) The Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund is created. The
fund shall include any settlement payments or other revenue received by the
State of Nebraska in connection with any tobacco-related litigation to which
the State of Nebraska is a party. The Department of Health and Human Services
shall remit such revenue to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.
(2) Subject to the terms and conditions of such litigation, money from the
Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund shall be transferred to the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund as provided in section 71-7611 or, until June 30, 2027,
to the Nebraska Transformational Project Fund.
(3) Any money in the Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 152. Section 71-7611, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-7611 (1) The Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund is created. The State
Treasurer shall transfer (a) sixty million three hundred thousand dollars on or
before July 15, 2014, (b) sixty million three hundred fifty thousand dollars on
or before July 15, 2015, (c) sixty million three hundred fifty thousand dollars
on or before July 15, 2016, (d) sixty million seven hundred thousand dollars on
or before July 15, 2017, (e) five hundred thousand dollars on or before May 15,
2018, (f) sixty-one million six hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15,
2018, (g) sixty-two million dollars on or before July 15, 2019, (h) sixty-one
million four hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2020, (i)
sixty-six million two hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2022, (j)
fifty-six million seven hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2023,
(k) fifty-four million dollars on or before July 15, 2024, and (l) fifty-nine
fifty-four million one hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 1,
-19-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
2025, and (m) sixty million one hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before
every July 15 thereafter from the Nebraska Medicaid Intergovernmental Trust
Fund and the Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund to the Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund, except that such amount shall be reduced by the amount of the
unobligated balance in the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund at the time the
transfer is made. The state investment officer shall advise the State Treasurer
on the amounts to be transferred first from the Nebraska Medicaid
Intergovernmental Trust Fund until the fund balance is depleted and from the
Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund thereafter in order to sustain such
transfers in perpetuity. The state investment officer shall report
electronically to the Legislature on or before October 1 of every even-numbered
year on the sustainability of such transfers. The Nebraska Health Care Cash
Fund shall also include money received pursuant to section 77-2602. Except as
otherwise provided by law, no more than the amounts specified in this
subsection may be appropriated or transferred from the Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund in any fiscal year.
The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Nebraska
Medicaid Intergovernmental Trust Fund to the General Fund on June 28, 2018, and
June 28, 2019.
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section,
it is the intent of the Legislature that no additional programs are funded
through the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund until funding for all programs with
an appropriation from the fund during FY2012-13 are restored to their FY2012-13
levels.
(2) Any money in the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) The University of Nebraska and postsecondary educational institutions
having colleges of medicine in Nebraska and their affiliated research hospitals
in Nebraska, as a condition of receiving any funds appropriated or transferred
from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, shall not discriminate against any
person on the basis of sexual orientation.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost of the staff and
operating costs necessary to carry out the changes made by Laws 2018, LB439,
and not covered by fees or federal funds shall be funded from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for fiscal years 2018-19 and 2019-20.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to fund the grants to be awarded
pursuant to section 75-1101 with the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for
FY2019-20 and FY2020-21.
(4) (6) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2022, but before June
30, 2023, to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for pancreatic cancer research at the
University of Nebraska Medical Center. Transfers from the Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund in this subsection shall be contingent upon receipt of any matching
funds from private or other sources, up to fifteen million dollars, certified
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services. Upon receipt of any matching funds certified by the
budget administrator, the State Treasurer shall transfer an equal amount of
funds to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.
Sec. 153. Section 72-232.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
72-232.02 The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall pay the costs of
administering the unsold school lands out of receipts from school land income.
A cash fund is hereby authorized and the State Treasurer shall, out of the
receipts for school land income, deposit in such cash fund that amount
appropriated by the Legislature for each fiscal year on the first day of each
fiscal year. Beginning October 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, any investment
earnings from investment of money in the cash fund shall be credited to the
General Fund. Beginning on July 1, 2025, any investment earnings from
investment of the money in the cash fund shall be credited to the Education
Future Fund.
Sec. 154. Section 72-820, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
72-820 The Game and Parks Commission may shall purchase or receive by
donation, and subsequently rehabilitate and manage, the Mayhew Cabin historical
site located in Nebraska City, Nebraska.
Sec. 155. Section 72-1001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
72-1001 The Nebraska Capital Construction Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of revenue and transfers credited to the fund as authorized by law.
Money shall be appropriated from the fund to state agencies for making payments
on projects as determined by the Legislature, including, but not limited to,
purchases of land, structural improvements to land, acquisition of buildings,
construction of buildings, including architectural and engineering costs,
replacement of or major repairs to structural improvements to land or
buildings, additions to existing structures, remodeling of buildings, and
acquisition of equipment and furnishings of new or remodeled buildings. The
fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer as a multiple-agency-use fund
and appropriated to state agencies as determined by the Legislature. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
-20-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Prior to July 1, 2025, any Any investment earnings from
investment of money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund shall be credited
to such fund, except that for fiscal years 2023-24 and , 2024-25, and 2025-26,
any investment earnings from investment of money in the Nebraska Capital
Construction Fund from transfers credited to such fund that are designated for
the construction of a new state prison shall be credited as provided in section
84-622. Beginning July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, any investment earnings
from investment of money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund shall be
credited to the General Fund. Beginning July 1, 2027, any investment earnings
from investment of money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund shall be
credited to the fund.
Sec. 156. Section 72-2211, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
72-2211 (1) The Capitol Restoration Cash Fund is created. The
administrator shall administer the fund, which shall consist of money received
from the sale of material, rental revenue, private donations, public donations,
and transfers as directed by the Legislature from the Capitol Preservation,
Restoration, and Enhancement Endowment Fund, the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund,
and transfers from the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund as directed by the
Legislature.
(2)(a) The Capitol Restoration Cash Fund shall be used to finance projects
for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of the State Capitol and its
courtyards and grounds, to purchase and conserve items to be added to the
Nebraska Capitol Collections housed in the State Capitol, to produce
promotional material concerning the State Capitol, its grounds, and the
Nebraska State Capitol Environs District, and to pay the expenditures for a
project manager for the Capitol Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning
Systems Replacement Project until such time as the project is completed, except
that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Such expenditures shall be prescribed by the administrator
and approved by the commission.
(b) Money transferred to the fund from the Capitol Preservation,
Restoration, and Enhancement Endowment Fund shall only be used for the
restoration, preservation, and enhancement of the courtyards located at the
State Capitol.
(3) Any money in the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 157. Section 72-2401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-2401 The Ferguson House Fund is created. The fund shall be used by the
state building division of the Department of Administrative Services Nebraska
Environmental Trust Board only for the operation, administration, maintenance,
restoration, and renovation of the Ferguson House and grounds. Revenue credited
to the fund may consist of rental or other income related to the Ferguson House
as well as gifts, grants, and bequests. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 158. Section 75-1101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
75-1101 (1) For purposes of this section, 211 Information and Referral
Network means a statewide information and referral network providing
information to the public regarding disaster and emergency response and health
and human services provided by public and private entities throughout the
state.
(2) The Public Service Commission shall award a grant annually to a 211
Information and Referral Network which submits an application and meets the
requirements of this section.
(3) To be eligible for a grant, the 211 Information and Referral Network
shall update the information and referral services on the network at least
annually, shall geographically index the services to provide information on a
county-by-county basis, and shall be accredited as meeting the standards for
service delivery and quality by the Alliance of Information and Referral
Systems or a similar organization approved by the commission.
(4) The grant may be used to establish a website which includes links to
providers of health and human services, the name, address, and telephone number
of any organization listed on the website, a description of the type of
services provided by the organization, and other information to educate the
public about the health and human services available on a geographic basis. The
grant may also be used to provide access to the network twenty-four hours per
day, seven days per week, through telephone access and website access.
(5) There is hereby created the 211 Cash Fund. The fund shall be used
solely for the purpose of providing grants pursuant to this section and
associated administrative costs, except that transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. All money
received by the Public Service Commission for such grants shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the 211 Cash Fund such fund. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 159. Section 76-3219, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-21-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
76-3219 The board shall collect all fees and other revenue pursuant to the
Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act and shall remit such
fees and revenue to the State Treasurer for credit to the Appraisal Management
Company Fund, which is hereby created. The fund shall be used to implement,
administer, and enforce the act, except that transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Appraisal Management Company Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 160. Section 77-2911, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2911 The Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the Nebraska State Historical
Society and shall consist of all fees credited to the fund pursuant to section
77-2907. The fund shall be used to administer and enforce the Nebraska Job
Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act. Transfers may be made from the fund
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 161. Section 77-4025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-4025 (1) There is hereby created a cash fund in the Department of
Revenue to be known as the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund. All
revenue collected or received by the Tax Commissioner from the license fees,
certification fees, and taxes imposed by the Tobacco Products Tax Act shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Tobacco Products
Administration Cash Fund, except that all such revenue relating to electronic
nicotine delivery systems shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the General Fund.
(2) All costs required for administration of the Tobacco Products Tax Act
shall be paid from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund. Credits and
refunds allowed under the act shall be paid from the Tobacco Products
Administration Cash Fund. Any receipts, after credits and refunds, in excess of
the amounts sufficient to cover the costs of administration may be transferred
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million five hundred thousand
dollars from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund
on or after July 1, 2025, but on or before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer
nine million five hundred thousand dollars from the Tobacco Products
Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but on
or before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million dollars from the
Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July
1, 2027, but on or before June 30, 2028, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million
dollars from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund
on or after July 1, 2028, but on or before June 30, 2029, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(4) Any money in the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 162. Section 77-4310.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-4310.03 There is hereby created the Marijuana and Controlled Substances
Tax Administration Cash Fund. Money in the fund shall be used by the Tax
Commissioner for the purposes of administering, collecting, and enforcing the
tax imposed by section 77-4303, except that transfers may be made from the fund
to the General Fund or the Department of Revenue Property Assessment Division
Cash Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Marijuana and
Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 163. Section 77-6841, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-6841 (1) The Legislature finds that providing job training is critical
to the public purpose of attracting and retaining businesses and that the
growth of high-paying jobs in Nebraska is limited by an unmet need for
workforce training and infrastructure development. The Legislature further
finds that many communities in Nebraska lack the infrastructure, including
broadband access, necessary to provide high-paying jobs for residents. The
Legislature further finds that workforce training and infrastructure
development help businesses and improve the quality of life for workers and
communities in Nebraska. Because there is a statewide benefit from workforce
training and infrastructure development, the Legislature intends to provide a
revolving loan program as a rational means to address these needs.
(2) The Department of Economic Development shall establish and administer
a revolving loan program for workforce training and infrastructure development
-22-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
expenses to be incurred by applicants for incentives under the ImagiNE Nebraska
Act.
(3) The ImagiNE Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund is hereby created. The fund
shall receive money from appropriations from the Legislature, grants, private
contributions, repayment of loans, and all other sources. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the ImagiNE Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. It is the
intent of the Legislature to transfer five million dollars from the General
Fund to the ImagiNE Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund for fiscal years 2022-23 and
2023-24 for purposes of carrying out the workforce training and infrastructure
development revolving loan program pursuant to the ImagiNE Nebraska Act. It is
the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five million dollars for fiscal
years 2022-23 and 2023-24 for purposes of carrying out the workforce training
and infrastructure development revolving loan program pursuant to the ImagiNE
Nebraska Act.
(4) The Department of Economic Development, as part of its comprehensive
business development strategy, shall administer the ImagiNE Nebraska Revolving
Loan Fund and may loan funds to applicants under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act to
secure new, high-paying jobs in Nebraska based on the criteria established in
sections 77-6842 and 77-6843. Loans made to applicants under the ImagiNE
Nebraska Act and interest on such loans may be repaid using credits earned
under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act. If that occurs, the Department of Revenue shall
certify the credit usage to the State Treasurer, who shall, within thirty days,
transfer the amount of the credit used from the General Fund to the ImagiNE
Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund.
(5) If a taxpayer with an agreement under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act obtains
a loan under this section and fails to attain the required minimum number of
new employees, minimum compensation, and minimum required cumulative investment
necessary for that taxpayer to earn a credit, the principal and interest of the
loan shall be considered an underpayment of tax and may be recovered by the
Department of Revenue.
(6) Whether repaid using credits or repaid directly by the recipient of
the loan, loans made from the ImagiNE Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund shall be
repaid with interest at the rate established in section 45-102.
Sec. 164. Section 79-810, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-810 (1) Certificates and permits shall be issued by the commissioner
upon application on forms prescribed and provided by him or her which shall
include the applicant's social security number.
(2) Each certificate or permit issued by the commissioner shall indicate
the area of authorization to teach, provide special services, or administer and
any areas of endorsement for which the holder qualifies. During the term of any
certificate or permit issued by the commissioner, additional endorsements may
be made on the certificate or permit if the holder submits an application,
meets the requirements for issuance of the additional endorsements, and pays a
nonrefundable fee as set by the commissioner, not to exceed fifty-five dollars.
(3) The department shall make available on a portal on the department's
website the option or ability for an individual with a certificate or permit to
apply for an endorsement. Such portal shall also include a list of courses that
an individual with a certificate or permit may take to add an endorsement to
such certificate or permit. The commissioner shall allow an individual with a
certificate or permit the following alternative methods of obtaining an
endorsement:
(a) Taking a subject-specific content examination in designated
endorsement areas and indicating such subject as an endorsement on such
individual's certificate or permit based solely on passage of the examination;
or
(b) Completing an approved program of equivalent professional education in
a designated endorsement area that is provided by an accredited public school.
(4) The Certification Fund is created. Any fee received by the department
under sections 79-806 to 79-815 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the fund. The fund shall be used by the department in paying the
costs of certifying educators pursuant to such sections and to carry out
subsection (3) of section 79-808. For issuance of a certificate or permit valid
in all schools, the nonrefundable fee shall be set by the commissioner, not to
exceed sixty-five dollars. Transfers may be made from the Certification
Professional Practices Commission Fund to the Education Future Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall transfer any money
remaining in the Professional Practices Commission Fund on July 19, 2024, to
the Certification Fund as soon after such date as administratively possible.
Any money in the Certification Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 165. Section 79-1064, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1064 The State Department of Education Cash Fund is created. Except as
to other revenue the disposition of which is otherwise provided for, all sums
of money received by the State Department of Education from the sale of goods
and materiel, fees from any training program or services rendered, and any
revenue such department may receive from any other source shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the State Department of Education Cash Fund.
-23-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
The State Treasurer shall disburse such amounts in the fund as are available
and considered incident to the administration and operation of the State
Department of Education. Money in the State Department of Education Cash Fund
may be transferred to the General Fund or the Education Future Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. All disbursements for the State Department of
Education Cash Fund shall be made upon vouchers issued by the State Department
of Education and warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services. Any
money in the State Department of Education Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 166. Section 79-1119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1119 Excess cost means the difference between the total cost of the
special education program excluding residential care minus federal medicaid
funds received pursuant to section 43-2511 for services to school-age children
excluding amounts designated as reimbursement for costs associated with the
implementation and administration of the billing system pursuant to section
43-2511 and minus the product of the number of students in the special
education program multiplied by the adjusted average per pupil cost of the
preceding year for the school district of residence of each child.
Sec. 167. Section 79-1142, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1142 (1) Level I services refers to services provided to children with
disabilities who require an aggregate of not more than three hours per week of
special education services and support services and includes all
administrative, diagnostic, consultative, and vocational-adjustment counselor
services.
(2)(a) The total allowable excess cost for special education programs and
support services is (i) the excess cost for special education programs plus
(ii) the total allowable reimbursable cost for support services minus (iii)
federal medicaid funds received pursuant to section 43-2511 for services to
school-age children excluding amounts designated pursuant to such section as
reimbursement for costs associated with the implementation and administration
of the billing system.
(b) (2) The total allowable reimbursable cost for support services shall
not exceed a percentage, established by the State Board of Education, of the
school district's or approved cooperative's total allowable reimbursable cost
for all special education programs and support services. The percentage
established by the board for support services shall not exceed the difference
of ten percent minus the percentage of the appropriations for special education
approved by the Legislature set aside for reimbursements for support services
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
(3)(a) (3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, for
special education and support services provided in each school fiscal year, the
department shall reimburse each school district in the following school fiscal
year a pro rata amount eighty percent of the total allowable excess costs for
all special education programs and support services as determined by the
department pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of this section. Cooperatives of
school districts or educational service units shall also be eligible for
reimbursement for cooperative programs pursuant to this section if such
cooperatives or educational service units have complied with the reporting and
approval requirements of section 79-1155 for cooperative programs which were
offered in the preceding school fiscal year.
(b) The department shall reimburse the total allowable excess costs for
all special education programs and support services from the General Fund and
Education Future Fund appropriations approved by the Legislature for special
education pursuant to section 79-1145, minus the amounts set aside pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section, on a pro rata basis at the maximum rate of
reimbursement such appropriations will allow as determined by the department.
(4) The department shall make the reimbursement payments (4)(a) The
payments shall be made by the department to the school district of residence,
cooperative of school districts, or educational service unit each school fiscal
year in a minimum of seven payments between the fifth and twentieth day of each
month beginning in December. Such reimbursement payments may be adjusted as
claims are reviewed and finalized Additional payments may be made based upon
additional valid claims submitted. The State Treasurer shall, between the fifth
and twentieth day of each month, notify the Director of Administrative Services
of the amount of funds available in the General Fund and the Education Future
Fund for payment purposes. The director shall, upon receiving such
certification, draw warrants against such funds as appropriated.
(b) If the General Fund appropriations for special education approved by
the Legislature, minus the amounts set aside pursuant to subsection (5) of this
section, are insufficient to reimburse eighty percent of the total allowable
excess costs for all special education programs and support services for any
school fiscal year:
(i) Such allowable excess costs shall be reimbursed from the General Fund
appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature, minus the
amounts set aside pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, on a pro rata
basis at the maximum rate of reimbursement such appropriations will allow as
determined by the department; and
(ii) The remainder of the eighty percent reimbursement of such allowable
excess costs shall be paid from the Education Future Fund.
(5) Residential settings described in subdivision (10)(c) of section
-24-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
79-215 shall be reimbursed for the educational services, including special
education services and support services, in an amount determined pursuant to
the average per pupil cost of the service agency. Reimbursements pursuant to
this section shall be made from funds set aside for such purpose within sixty
days after receipt of a reimbursement request submitted in the manner required
by the department and including any documentation required by the department
for educational services that have been provided, except that if there are not
any funds available for the remainder of the state fiscal year for such
reimbursements, the reimbursement shall occur within thirty days after the
beginning of the immediately following state fiscal year. The department may
audit any required documentation and subtract any payments made in error from
future reimbursements. The department shall set aside separate amounts from the
appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature for
reimbursements pursuant to this subsection for students receiving special
education services and for students receiving support services for each state
fiscal year. The amounts set aside for each purpose shall be based on estimates
of the reimbursements to be requested during the state fiscal year and shall
not be less than the total amount of reimbursements requested in the prior
state fiscal year plus any unpaid requests from the prior state fiscal year.
(6) For each school district that received a payment pursuant to the
Extraordinary Increase in Special Education Expenditures Act in the school
fiscal year for which special education expenditures were reimbursed pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section, an amount equal to such payment shall be
subtracted from the reimbursement calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section and such amount shall be transferred to the Education Future Fund.
(7) On or before November 15 of each year, the department shall submit to
the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, and the
Education Committee of the Legislature:
(a) The total allowable excess costs for all special education programs
and support services for all school districts, cooperatives of school
districts, and educational service units; and
(b) The total reimbursements requested pursuant to subsection (5) of this
section for the most recently completed school fiscal year.
Sec. 168. Section 79-1145, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1145 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Nonreimbursable expenditure means an expenditure included within the
total allowable excess cost for all special education programs and support
services as submitted to the department on or before the first October 31
following the school fiscal year in which the expenditure occurred that is
later determined to be nonreimbursable as a special education program or
support services expenditure; and
(b) Three-year average nonreimbursable expenditures means the average
total nonreimbursable expenditures for all school districts for the most recent
three school fiscal years for which such information is available.
(2)(a) For each fiscal year, the aggregate amount appropriated from the of
General Fund and the Education Future Fund Funds appropriated for special
education programs and support services pursuant to sections 79-1129, 79-1132,
and 79-1144 shall not be less than the amounts required pursuant to section
79-1142 to (i) reimburse residential settings described in subdivision (10)(c)
of section 79-215 for educational services and reimburse eighty percent of the
total allowable excess costs for all special education programs and support
services or (ii) meet federal maintenance of state financial support
requirements, whichever is greater exceed the aggregate amount of General Funds
appropriated pursuant to such sections for the previous fiscal year, increased
by ten percent.
(b) The amount required to reimburse eighty percent of the total allowable
excess costs for all special education programs and support services shall be
calculated by subtracting eighty percent of three-year average nonreimbursable
expenditures from eighty percent of the total allowable excess costs for all
special education programs and support services as submitted to the department
on or before the first October 31 following the school fiscal year in which the
allowable excess costs occurred.
Sec. 169. Section 79-2510, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2510 (1) The Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the department and shall consist of transfers
pursuant to section 79-3501, repayments of grant funds, and interest payments
received in the course of administering the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant
Program Act. The fund shall be used to carry out the Expanded Learning
Opportunity Grant Program Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the department, may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Expanded Learning
Opportunity Grant Program Act.
Sec. 170. Section 79-3501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3501 (1) For fiscal years through fiscal year 2023-24, the money
available to be used for education pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of section
9-812 shall be transferred to the Nebraska Education Improvement Fund.
-25-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
(2) For fiscal years 2024-25 through 2028-29, the money available to be
used for education pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of section 9-812 shall be
transferred as follows:
(a) Eight percent to the Behavioral Training Cash Fund;
(b) Two percent to the College Pathway Program Cash Fund;
(c) Seven percent to the Community College Gap Assistance Program Fund;
(d) Ten percent to the State Department of Education Improvement Grant
Fund;
(e) Three percent to fund distance education incentives pursuant to
section 79-1337;
(f) One percent to the Door to College Scholarship Fund;
(g) Eight percent to the Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund;
(h) One and one-half percent to the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant
Fund;
(i) One and one-half percent to the Mental Health Training Cash Fund; and
(j) Fifty-eight percent to the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund.
(3) For fiscal year 2029-30 and each fiscal year thereafter, the money
available to be used for education pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of section
9-812 shall be transferred as the Legislature may direct.
(4)(a) The Nebraska Education Improvement Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of money transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and any
other funds transferred by the Legislature. Transfers may be made from the fund
to the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The Nebraska
Education Improvement Fund fund shall be allocated, after actual and necessary
administrative expenses, as provided in this subsection for fiscal years
2016-17 through 2023-24. A portion of each allocation for fiscal year 2023-24
may be retained by the agency to which the allocation is made or the agency
administering the fund to which the allocation is made for actual and necessary
expenses incurred by such agency for administration, evaluation, and technical
assistance related to the purposes of the allocation, except that no amount of
the allocation to the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund may be used for such
purposes.
(b) For fiscal years 2017-18 through 2023-24, an amount equal to ten
percent of the revenue received by the Nebraska Education Improvement Fund in
the prior fiscal year shall be retained in the fund at all times plus any
interest earned during the current fiscal year. The balance of the fund on July
26, 2024, less three percent of the money received for the fourth quarter of
fiscal year 2023-24, shall be transferred to the Behavioral Training Cash Fund.
(c) For fiscal year 2023-24, the Nebraska Education Improvement Fund shall
be allocated as follows:
(i) One percent of the allocated funds to the Expanded Learning
Opportunity Grant Fund to carry out the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant
Program Act;
(ii) Seventeen percent of the allocated funds to the State Department of
Education Improvement Grant Fund to be used for competitive innovation grants
pursuant to section 79-1054;
(iii) Nine percent of the allocated funds to the Community College Gap
Assistance Program Fund to carry out the community college gap assistance
program;
(iv) Eight percent of the allocated funds to the Excellence in Teaching
Cash Fund to carry out the Excellence in Teaching Act;
(v) Sixty-two percent of the allocated funds to the Nebraska Opportunity
Grant Fund to carry out the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act in conjunction with
appropriations from the General Fund; and
(vi) Three percent of the allocated funds to fund distance education
incentives pursuant to section 79-1337.
(d) For fiscal year 2029-30 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Nebraska
Education Improvement Fund shall be allocated as the Legislature may direct.
(e) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) A portion of each transfer pursuant to subdivisions (2)(c), (e), (f),
(g), (h), and (i) of this section may be retained by the agency administering
the fund to which such transfer is made for actual and necessary expenses
incurred by such agency for administration, evaluation, and technical
assistance related to the purposes of the transfer.
(6)(a) On or before September 20, 2022, and on or before each September 20
thereafter, (i) any department or agency receiving a transfer or acting as the
administrator for a fund receiving a transfer pursuant to subsection (2) or (4)
of this section, (ii) any recipient or subsequent recipient of money from any
such fund, and (iii) any service contractor responsible for managing any
portion of any such fund or any money disbursed from any such fund on behalf of
any entity shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Auditor of Public
Accounts in a manner prescribed by the auditor for the immediately preceding
July 1 through June 30 fiscal year detailing information regarding the use of
such fund or such money.
(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall annually compile a summary of the
annual reports received pursuant to subdivision (6)(a) of this section, any
audits related to transfers pursuant to subsection (2) or (4) of this section
conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts, and any findings or
recommendations related to such transfers into a consolidated annual report and
shall submit such consolidated annual report electronically to the Legislature
on or before January 1, 2023, and on or before each January 1 thereafter.
-26-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
(c) For purposes of this subsection, recipient, subsequent recipient, or
service contractor means a nonprofit entity that expends funds transferred
pursuant to subsection (2) or (4) of this section to carry out a state program
or function, but does not include an individual who is a direct beneficiary of
such a program or function.
(7) On or before December 31, 2027, the Education Committee of the
Legislature shall electronically submit recommendations to the Clerk of the
Legislature regarding how the money used for education from the State Lottery
Operation Trust Fund should be allocated to best advance the educational
priorities of the state for the five-year period beginning with fiscal year
2029-30.
Sec. 171. Section 81-179, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-179 (1) There is hereby created under the control of the Governor, for
allocation to building renewal projects of the various agencies, a fund to be
known as the Building Renewal Allocation Fund. The fund shall contain the
revenue from the special privilege tax as provided in section 77-2602 and such
other money as is appropriated by the Legislature. Such appropriation is
declared to consist of building renewal funds which shall be kept separate and
distinct from the program continuation funds and project construction funds.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature.
(2) Separate subfunds, subprograms, projects, or accounts shall be
established to separately account for any expenditures on state buildings or
facilities to comply with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.
A minimal amount of the funds contained in the subfunds, subprograms, projects,
or accounts may be used for planning and evaluation of buildings and
facilities.
(3) The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services may
administratively transfer funds to appropriate accounting entities to correctly
account for the operating expenditures. A separate fund, cash fund, project, or
other account may be administratively established for such purpose.
(4) Any money in the Building Renewal Allocation Fund fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred eighty-three thousand
six hundred sixty-seven dollars from the Building Renewal Allocation Fund to
the General Fund on or after June 15, 2018, but before June 30, 2018, on such
date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred thousand dollars from
the Building Renewal Allocation Fund to the General Fund on or after June 15,
2019, but before June 30, 2019, on such date as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred sixteen
thousand three hundred thirty-three dollars from the Building Renewal
Allocation Fund to the Accounting Division Cash Fund on July 1, 2017, or as
soon thereafter as administratively possible.
(8) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million three hundred thousand
dollars from the Building Renewal Allocation Fund to the Accounting Division
Cash Fund on July 1, 2018, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.
Sec. 172. Section 81-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-302 The Department of Banking and Finance Settlement Cash Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Banking and
Finance. The fund shall consist of money received by the state in settlements
resulting from regulatory or judicial resolution of financial, securities, or
consumer issues in which the department is designated as a recipient and any
investment income earned on the fund. The Department of Administrative Services
may for accounting purposes create subfunds of the fund to segregate awards or
allocations received pursuant to different orders or settlements. The fund may
be used by the Department of Banking and Finance for any allowable legal
purposes as determined by the Director of Banking and Finance. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Department of Banking and Finance Settlement Cash Fund fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 173. Section 81-407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-407 The Workforce Development Program Cash Fund is hereby created. The
fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature. The Department
of Labor shall administer the fund to provide workforce development grants.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund or the Nebraska
Opportunity Grant Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Workforce Development Program Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 174. Section 81-8,239.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-27-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
81-8,239.02 The following separate permanent revolving funds are
established in the state treasury for use under the Risk Management Program
according to the purposes for which each fund is established:
(1) The State Insurance Fund is hereby created for the purpose of
purchasing insurance to cover property, fidelity, and liability risks of the
state and workers' compensation claims against the state and other risks to
which the state or its agencies, officials, or employees are exposed and for
paying related expenses, including the costs of administering the Risk
Management Program. The fund may receive deposits from assessments against
state agencies to provide insurance coverage as directed by the Risk Manager.
The Risk Manager may retain in the fund sufficient money to pay for any
deductibles, self-insured retentions, or copayments as may be required by such
insurance policies and Risk Management Program expenses. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature;
(2) The State Self-Insured Property Fund is hereby created for the purpose
of replacing, repairing, or rebuilding state property which has incurred damage
or is suffering other loss not fully covered by insurance and for paying
related expenses. The fund may receive deposits from assessments against state
agencies to provide property coverage as directed by the Risk Manager. The Risk
Manager may assess state agencies to provide self-insured property coverage;
(3) The State Self-Insured Indemnification Fund is hereby created for the
purpose of paying indemnification claims under section 81-8,239.05.
Indemnification claims shall include payments for awards, settlements, and
associated costs, including appeal bonds and reasonable costs and attorney's
fees associated with a required appearance by agency legal counsel or other
legal counsel hired, with prior approval of the Attorney General, to represent
the agency, official, or employee before any tribunal. The fund may receive
deposits from assessments against state agencies to pay for the costs
associated with providing and supporting indemnification claims. The creation
of this fund shall not be interpreted as expanding the liability exposure of
the state or its agencies, officials, or employees; and
(4)(a) The State Self-Insured Liability Fund is hereby created for the
purpose of paying compensable liability and fidelity claims against the state
or its agencies, officials, or employees which are not fully covered by
insurance and for which there is insufficient agency funding and for which a
legislative appropriation is made under section 81-8,239.11.
(b) The fund may be used to pay claims against the state or its agencies,
officials, or employees for which there is a specific provision of law for the
resolution of such claims but which are not otherwise payable from the State
Insurance Fund, State Self-Insured Property Fund, State Self-Insured
Indemnification Fund, Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund, or Tort
Claims Fund. Such claims shall include payments for awards, settlements, and
associated costs, including appeal bonds and reasonable costs and attorney's
fees associated with a required appearance by agency legal counsel or other
legal counsel hired, with prior approval of the Attorney General, to represent
the agency, official, or employee before any tribunal.
(c) A claim for reasonable costs and attorney's fees described in
subdivision (b) of this subsection shall be paid from the State Self-Insured
Liability Fund if such claim results from the inability of the Attorney General
to represent an agency, official, or employee due to a conflict of interest. A
conflict of interest shall not be deemed to exist when the Attorney General is
a party to such claim or represents a party to such claim.
(d) The creation of this fund shall not be interpreted as expanding the
liability exposure of the state or its agencies, officials, or employees.
(e) The Risk Manager shall report electronically all claims and judgments
paid from the State Self-Insured Liability Fund to the Clerk of the Legislature
annually. The report shall include the name of the claimant, the amount claimed
and paid, and a brief description of the claim, including any agency, program,
and activity under which the claim arose. Any member of the Legislature may
receive an electronic copy of the report by making a request to the Risk
Manager.
Sec. 175. Section 81-1210.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1210.04 (1) The Intern Nebraska Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
used to carry out sections 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03. The fund shall consist of
money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and money donated as gifts,
bequests, or other contributions from public or private entities. Transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Department of Economic Development, or any entity with which the
department contracts for such purpose, may use up to five percent of any
appropriation to carry out sections 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03 for administrative
services.
Sec. 176. Section 81-1211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1211 The Lead-Based Paint Hazard Control Cash Fund is created in the
Department of Economic Development. The fund shall receive transfers from the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund as authorized by the Legislature. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the The department shall use the entirety
of the fund to award a grant to a city of the metropolitan class to carry out
lead-based paint hazard control on owner-occupied properties, contingent upon
-28-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
formal notification by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development that it intends to award a grant to a city of the metropolitan
class to carry out the federal Residential Lead-Based Paint Hazard Reduction
Act of 1992, 42 U.S.C. 4852, as such section existed on January 1, 2015. No
more than fifteen percent of the grant proceeds may be used for administrative
expenses. It is the intent of the Legislature that any grant awarded from the
Lead-Based Paint Hazard Control Cash Fund shall be applied to the congressional
district grant allocations as established under section 58-708. Transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Lead-Based Paint Hazard Control Cash Fund fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 177. Section 81-1213.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1213.02 The Economic Development Cash Fund is created. The Department
of Economic Development shall administer the fund to provide a grant to a
community college serving a city of the metropolitan class to partner with a
four-year public university serving a city of the metropolitan class to offer
microcredentials to support education expansion, curricula development, and
staff hires to meet demand for microchip fabrication and microelectronics
manufacturing in the state in conjunction with the Creating Helpful Incentives
to Produce Semiconductors (CHIPS) for America Act, Public Law 116-283. The fund
shall consist of money transferred by the Legislature and gifts, grants, or
bequests from any source, including money remitted to the fund from any other
federal, state, public, and private sources. Transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Economic Development Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 178. Section 81-1213.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1213.05 The Youth Outdoor Education Innovation Fund is created. The
fund shall consist of transfers made by the Legislature and any gifts, grants,
bequests, donations, or money remitted pursuant to section 81-1213.04 for
credit to the fund. The Department of Economic Development shall administer the
fund for the purposes described in section 81-1213.04. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Youth Outdoor Education Innovation Fund fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the fund.
Sec. 179. Section 81-1216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1216 The Customized Job Training Cash Fund is created. Funds in the
Customized Job Training Cash Fund shall be used for (1) general administrative
costs of awarding job training reimbursement grants under the Customized Job
Training Act, as such act existed prior to the operative date of this section,
and (2) job training reimbursement grants. Transfers may be made from the fund
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Customized Job Training Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 180. Section 81-12,174, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,174 (1) Investment means the amount paid by the applicant for:
(a) Funding, including private dollars, public dollars, matching funding,
and any other funding, used for:
(i) Improvements to real property that are (A) owned by the applicant or
will be owned by the applicant upon project completion, (B) located at the
qualified location, and (C) used to carry out the project; or
(ii) Equipment that is located at the qualified location and used to carry
out the project; or
(b) Other amounts necessary to carry out the project.
(2) Investment includes funding used to make improvements to real property
or for equipment or other amounts necessary to carry out the project prior to
the date of application.
(1) Real property that is (a) constructed after the date of application,
(b) owned by the applicant, (c) located at the qualified location, and (d) used
to carry out the project; or
(2) Equipment that is (a) purchased after the date of application, (b)
owned by the applicant, (c) located at the qualified location, and (d) used to
carry out the project.
Sec. 181. Section 81-12,176, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,176 (1) Private dollars means dollars invested in the project or
donated to the applicant specifically for the project by any combination of one
or more of the following:
(a) An individual;
(b) An organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of
the Internal Revenue Code; or
(c) Any nongovernmental organization.
(2) Private dollars does not include any direct or indirect funding from
-29-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
any federal, state, or local government.
Sec. 182. Section 81-12,177, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,177 Project means an investment by the applicant of at least one
billion six hundred million dollars at one qualified location by the end of the
transformational period for academic medical, research, education, and training
purposes which is made to carry out the requirements for the qualified location
to be included in the program described in Title VII, Subtitle C, section 740
of Public Law 116-92.
Sec. 183. Section 81-12,178, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,178 Qualified location means any parcel of real property, or
contiguous or adjacent parcels of real property, within the State of Nebraska
that is or are owned by the applicant, and such other parcels owned by the
applicant that are necessary to support the applicant's project at such parcel
or parcels. The Except to the extent required for a project to be included in
the program described in Title VII, Subtitle C, section 740 of Public Law
116-92, the award made for a qualified location may not be used for athletic or
recreational purposes, except that a qualified location may contain space,
totaling less than ten percent of the facility square footage at the project,
that may be used for food service or for exercise or recreational purposes as
is commonly used for the health and well-being of employees, students, and
patients.
Sec. 184. Section 81-12,182, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,182 (1) In order to be eligible to receive the matching funds
allowed in the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act, the applicant shall file
an application with the director, on a form developed by the director,
requesting an agreement.
(2) The application shall:
(a) Identify the project, including the qualified location of such
project , and state that the applicant is pursuing a partnership with the
federal government pursuant to Title VII, Subtitle C, section 740 of Public Law
116-92 for the project;
(b) State the estimated, projected amount of total new investment in at
the project, which shall not be less than one billion six hundred million
dollars, including the estimated, projected amount of private dollars, public
dollars, and matching funds, and other investments;
(c) Include an independent assessment of the economic impact to Nebraska
from the project and its construction, which shall be performed by a
professional economist or economics firm which is not in the regular employ of
the applicant. The assessment must show, to the reasonable satisfaction of the
director, an economic impact to Nebraska of at least two billion seven hundred
million dollars during the planning and construction period and at least four
billion six hundred million dollars during the ten-year period beginning either
when construction is commenced or when the application is approved;
(d) Include approval of the project and of submission of the application
by the governing body of the applicant. Approval of the project may be subject
to other federal, state, and local government approvals needed to complete the
project and subject to obtaining the funding, financing, and donations needed
for the project;
(e) State the E-Verify number or numbers that will be used by the
applicant for employees at the qualified location as provided by the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services; and
(f) Contain a nonrefundable application fee of twenty-five thousand
dollars. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Nebraska Transformational Project Fund.
(3) An application must be complete to establish the date of the
application. An application shall be considered complete once it contains the
items listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Once satisfied that the application is complete and that the applicant
is eligible to receive the matching funds allowed in the Nebraska
Transformational Projects Act, the director shall approve the application.
(5) There shall be no new applications filed under this section after
January 31, 2026 December 31, 2025. Any complete application filed on or before
January 31, 2026 December 31, 2025, shall be considered by the director and
approved if the location and applicant qualify for approval. Agreements may be
executed with regard to any complete application filed on or before January 31,
2026 December 31, 2025.
Sec. 185. Section 81-12,183, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,183 (1) Within ninety days after approval of the application, the
director shall prepare and deliver a written agreement to the applicant for the
applicant's signature. The applicant and the director, on behalf of the State
of Nebraska, shall enter into such written agreement. Under the agreement, the
applicant shall agree to undertake the project and report all investment for at
the project to the director annually. The director, on behalf of the State of
Nebraska, shall agree to allow the applicant to receive the matching funds
allowed in the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act, subject to appropriation
of such funds by the Legislature. The application, and all supporting
documentation, to the extent approved, shall be considered a part of the
agreement. The agreement shall state:
(a) The qualified location;
-30-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
(b) The type of documentation the applicant will need to document its
investment and receipt of private dollars under the act;
(c) The date the application was complete;
(d) A requirement that the applicant be and will stay registered for the
E-Verify Program provided by the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services for the duration of the project;
(e) A requirement that, after the completion of the application, the
applicant update the director, within sixty days after the occurrence of any of
the following events:
(i) Execution of an agreement for construction of real property at the
project;
(ii) Local approval for construction of real property at the project;
(iii) A binding commitment for financing of the project by a private
lender, to the extent applicable;
(iv) Commencement of construction of real property at the project; and
(v) The issuance of a certificate of occupancy for real property at the
project;
(f) A requirement that the applicant provide any information needed by the
director to perform his or her responsibilities under the Nebraska
Transformational Projects Act, in the manner specified by the director;
(g) A requirement that the applicant provide an annually updated timetable
showing the private dollars donated and received and the investment for at the
project, in the manner specified by the director; and
(h) A requirement that the applicant update the director annually, with
its timetable or in the manner specified by the director, on any changes in
plans or circumstances which it reasonably expects will affect the investment
or expected donations for the project.
(2) The agreement shall state that any Any failure by the applicant to
timely provide timely the updates or information required by the director or
the act may result in the loss of the right to receive matching funds or, at
the discretion of the director, result in the deferral of matching fund
disbursements until such updates and information have been provided to the
director by the applicant.
(3) The agreement shall state that the The applicant shall agree to
provide documentation to the director validating the receipt of private dollars
received throughout the continuation period but is not required to disclose the
names of any donors of private dollars.
(4) An agreement under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act shall
have a duration of no more than fifteen years after the date of application,
consisting of up to the ten years of the transformational period followed by
the five-year continuation period, except that such agreement shall remain
effective until all matching fund payments have been received as provided for
under the act.
(5) An agreement under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act must be
approved by the governing body of the applicant to be valid.
Sec. 186. Section 81-12,184, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,184 The following transactions or activities shall not create
investment under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act except as
specifically allowed by this section:
(1) The renegotiation of any private donor commitment in existence before
the date of application and not originally intended for the project, except to
the extent of additional donation commitments for the project;
(2) The purchase of any property which was previously owned by the
applicant or a related entity. The first purchase by either the applicant or a
related entity shall be treated as investment if the item was first placed in
service in the state after the date of the application;
(3) The renegotiation of any agreement in existence on the date of
application and not originally intended for the project which does not
materially change any of the material terms of the agreement shall be presumed
to be a transaction entered into for the purpose of facilitating benefits under
the act and shall not be allowed in the meeting of the required investment
level under the act; and
(4) Any purchase of property from a related entity, except that the
applicant will be considered to have made investment under the act to the
extent the related entity would have been considered to have made investment on
the purchase of the property if the related entity was considered the
applicant.
Sec. 187. Section 81-12,185, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,185 (1) Subject to section 81-12,188, an applicant shall , upon the
applicant's project being selected for the program established under Title VII,
Subtitle C, section 740 of Public Law 116-92 and the receipt of one billion
federal dollars, be entitled to receive , matching funds from the State of
Nebraska , equal to fifteen percent of the total investment dollars expended on
the project, up to fifty million dollars each year or as allowed in section
81-12,189, and not to exceed three hundred million dollars as matching funds
for the three hundred million dollars of private dollars received by the
applicant by the end of the continuation period.
(2) Subject to section 81-12,188, the state shall pay the available
matching funds to the applicant on an annual basis.
Sec. 188. Section 81-12,186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-31-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
81-12,186 (1) The right to matching funds prescribed in section 81-12,185
shall be established by filing the forms required by the director. The matching
funds may only be used by the applicant to make investments for at the project
or to pay off debt financing for such investments. Matching funds, and private
dollars, public dollars, and all other investment in the project shall be
counted towards the attainment of the one-billion-six-hundred-million-dollar
investment requirement.
(2) Interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may
from time to time be adjusted, shall be due by the applicant on any repayment
of matching funds.
(3) All interpretations of the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act
shall be made by the director.
(4) An audit of a project shall be made by the director to the extent and
in the manner determined by the director. The director may recover any matching
funds which were erroneously allowed by issuing a repayment determination
within the later of three years from the date the matching funds were paid or
three years after the end of the continuation period.
(5) Any determination by the director that the applicant does not qualify,
that a location is not a qualified location, that a project does not qualify,
that an investment a private-dollar donation does not qualify, or that matching
funds must be repaid may be protested by the applicant to the director within
sixty days after the mailing to the applicant of the written notice of the
proposed determination by the director. If the notice of proposed determination
is not protested in writing by the applicant within the sixty-day period, the
proposed determination is a final determination. If the notice is protested,
the director, after a formal hearing by the director or by an independent
hearing officer appointed by the director, if requested by the applicant in
such protest, shall issue a written order resolving such protest.
Sec. 189. Section 81-12,187, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,187 (1) The project applicant must receive make an investment of one
billion six hundred million dollars at the project, of which at least one
billion dollars shall come from federal funding, before the end of the
transformational period. If the project investment applicant fails to reach
such threshold, all of the matching funds paid to the applicant under the
Nebraska Transformational Projects Act shall be repaid by the applicant to the
director, and the applicant shall be entitled to no matching funds for the
project.
(2) The project applicant must maintain the required level of investment
for the entire continuation period. If the project applicant fails to maintain
the required level of investment for the entire continuation period, all of the
matching funds paid to the applicant under the act shall be repaid by the
applicant to the director, and the applicant shall be entitled to no matching
funds for the project.
(3) If the applicant fails to receive, before the end of the continuation
period, three hundred million dollars of donations of private dollars to be
used for the project, then all matching funds paid to the applicant under the
act shall be repaid by the applicant to the director.
(3) (4) The repayment required by this section shall not occur if (a) the
failure to receive a donation, or achieve or maintain the required level of
investment, was caused by an act of God or a national emergency or (b) the
state does not fully fund the matching funds as qualified pursuant to section
81-12,185.
Sec. 190. Section 81-12,189, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,189 If the applicant cannot be paid in full in any given fiscal
year, then the matching funds shall be paid in later years until fully funded.
If, based upon total investment expended, the applicant is not entitled to
receive the maximum of fifty million dollars in matching funds in any given
year, the balance of matching funds shall be carried forward and available for
distribution in future years as provided in section 81-12,185.
Sec. 191. Section 81-12,191, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,191 (1) No later than October 1 following the approval of the
application , 2024, and no later than October 1 of each year thereafter until
the end of the transformational period, the director shall submit
electronically an annual report for the previous fiscal year to the
Legislature. The report shall be on a fiscal year, accrual basis that satisfies
the requirements set by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board. The
director shall, on or before December 15 following the approval of the
application , 2024, and on or before December 15 of each year thereafter,
appear at a joint hearing of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature
and the Revenue Committee of the Legislature and present the report. Any
supplemental information requested by three or more committee members shall be
presented within thirty days after the request.
(2) The report shall state (a) the payment of matching funds made by the
State of Nebraska, (b) the expected payments of matching funds still to be made
by the State of Nebraska, and (c) the investments investment made in the
project by the applicant.
(3) The report shall provide an explanation of the audit and review
processes of the Department of Economic Development in approving and rejecting
the provision of matching funds and in enforcing matching funds repayment.
(4) No information shall be provided in the report or in supplemental
-32-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
information that is protected by state or federal confidentiality laws. The
identity of private donors shall not be included in the report.
Sec. 192. Section 81-12,193, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,193 (1) The Nebraska Transformational Project Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall receive money from application fees paid under the
Nebraska Transformational Projects Act and from transfers authorized by
appropriations from the Legislature, grants, private contributions, repayments
of matching funds, and all other sources. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Treasurer shall
transfer an amount not to exceed three hundred million dollars to the Nebraska
Transformational Project Fund. Such transfers shall only occur after the
director has received sufficient documentation of investment in the project
applicant has been selected for participation in the program described in Title
VII, Subtitle C, section 740 of Public Law 116-92 and commitments totaling one
billion three hundred million dollars in total investment, including only
federal dollars and private donations, have been secured. In no case shall any
transfer occur before fiscal year 2025-26. Distributions shall only be made
from the fund to the applicant each year in amounts equal to fifteen percent of
the investment expended for the project, up to fifty million dollars each year
as allowed in section 81-12,189. For each year in which fifteen percent of
investment expended exceeds the annual state limit of fifty million dollars,
the excess investment amounts shall be credited to the following year's
matching eligibility total the amount of private dollars received by the
applicant for the project.
(3) Any money remaining in the fund after all obligations have been met
shall be transferred to the General Fund.
Sec. 193. Section 81-12,224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,224 The Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature and
any gifts, grants, or bequests from any source, including federal, state,
public, and private sources. The fund shall be administered by the department
and shall be used to make grants under the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and
Investment Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery
and Investment Fund fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
Sec. 194. Section 81-12,238, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,238 Sections 81-12,238 to 81-12,243 81-12,244 shall be known and may
be cited as the Economic Recovery Act.
Sec. 195. Section 81-12,243, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,243 (1) The Economic Recovery Contingency Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of transfers by the Legislature to carry out the Economic
Recovery Act. Transfers may be made from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund
to the General Fund, the State Park Cash Revolving Fund, or the Museum
Construction and Maintenance Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment
earnings on and after July 1, 2023, and prior to July 1, 2025, shall be
credited to the fund. Beginning July 1, 2025, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) The Department of Economic Development may review the projects listed
in the coordination plan and the appendices by the Economic Recovery Special
Committee of the Legislature dated January 10, 2023, and shall prioritize the
use of the fund on projects listed in the coordination plan followed by the
projects in the appendices.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the Museum Construction
and Maintenance Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before December 31, 2024, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State
Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from the Economic Recovery
Contingency Fund to the Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund on or after
July 1, 2025, but before December 31, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer thirty million dollars from the
Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the Inland Port Authority Fund no later
than five business days after April 17, 2024, for the purpose of creating and
operating an innovation district by an inland port authority and for any other
purpose authorized under the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act.
(3) (5) The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated funds remaining
in the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund on July 31, 2026, to the Inland Port
Authority Fund. Any cash fund estimates for administrative costs related to the
-33-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
Economic Recovery Act provided by the Department of Economic Development in a
budget request report pursuant to section 81-132 shall be considered an
obligation of the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund. Any transfer of money
from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund authorized by the Legislature and
scheduled to occur after July 31, 2026, shall be considered an obligation of
the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven million dollars from the
Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the Museum Construction and Maintenance
Fund on or after January 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and
in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division
of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 196. Section 81-12,245, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,245 (1) The Department of Economic Development shall use any funds
received from the federal Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund under the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 as follows:
(a) No more than thirty-five million dollars to eligible projects that are
located within a congressional district which contains a city of the
metropolitan class. Within a city of the metropolitan class, grants shall be
given to multipurpose community facilities;
(b) No less than forty million dollars to eligible projects that are
located within a congressional district which contains a city of the primary
class;
(c) No less than forty million dollars to eligible projects that are
located within a congressional district which does not contain a city of the
metropolitan class or a city of the primary class. Grants under this
subdivision shall be awarded to eligible projects in cities of the second class
and villages; and
(d) No more than five million dollars of such federal funds for the
administration by the department of funds received from the federal Coronavirus
Capital Projects Fund under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.
(2) Any funds received from the federal Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund
under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 utilized for eligible
broadband infrastructure projects shall be administered in a manner consistent
with the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act, except that the matching funds
requirement in section 86-1304 shall not apply to such federal funding for
broadband projects.
(2) (3) The department shall, beginning July 1, 2022, through July 15,
2022, allow a qualified public or private entity to apply for a grant using
funds received from the federal Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund under the
federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. The department may open additional
grant application periods as needed until all funds are allocated.
(3) (4) Grants under subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall be
restricted to eligible projects located within or adjacent to one or more
qualified census tracts or economic redevelopment areas as defined in section
81-12,153 in a city of the metropolitan class. Priority for grants under
subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall be given to a city of the metropolitan
class in partnership with a nonprofit organization for eligible projects for
the rehabilitation or expansion of existing multipurpose community facilities.
Sec. 197. Section 81-1329, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1329 The Community College State Dependents Fund is created. The fund
shall be used to reimburse tuition expenses for dependents of Nebraska state
employees enrolled in one of the state's six community colleges. The Department
of Administrative Services shall administer the fund through the benefits
administration program. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the
Legislature and any gifts, grants, or bequests for such purposes from any
source, including federal, state, public, and private sources. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Community College State Dependents Fund fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 198. Section 81-1558, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1558 There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund to be
known as the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund. The proceeds of the
fee imposed by sections 81-1559 to 81-1560.02, money received by the department
as gifts, donations, or contributions toward the goals stated in section
81-1535, and money received by the department for nonprofit activities
concerning litter reduction and recycling, including, but not limited to,
honoraria, literature furnished by the department, and funds realized as
reimbursement for expenses in conducting educational forums, shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to such fund to be used for the
administration and enforcement of the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling
Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 199. Section 81-15,174, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,174 The Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund is created. The fund shall
-34-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
be maintained in the state accounting system as a cash fund. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the fund shall be used to carry out the
purposes of the Nebraska Environmental Trust Act, including the payment of
administrative costs. Money in the fund shall include proceeds credited
pursuant to section 9-812 and proceeds designated by the board pursuant to
section 81-15,173. Transfers may be made from the Nebraska Environmental Trust
Fund to the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund, the Water Resources Cash
Fund, or the Water Sustainability Fund at the direction of the Legislature, and
any money so transferred shall be expended in accordance with section
81-15,168. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
Sec. 200. Section 81-15,300, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,300 There is hereby created the Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund
which shall be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Environment and
Energy related to engineering reviews of plans and specifications, including
those under subsection (3) of section 81-15,268 and subsection (2) of section
81-15,282. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Engineering Plan Review Cash
Fund fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the
Health and Human Services Cash Fund pursuant to subsection (3) of section
81-15,268 and subsection (2) of section 81-15,282, as such sections existed
prior to July 1, 2021, to the Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund on July 1,
2021.
Sec. 201. Section 81-2004.07, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2004.07 The Nebraska State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund is
created. The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety of the
Nebraska State Patrol shall administer the fund. The fund shall be used to
purchase motor vehicles for the Nebraska State Patrol. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Nebraska State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 202. Section 81-2004.08, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2004.08 (1) The Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund
is created. The fund shall be established within the Nebraska State Patrol and
administered by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety. The
fund shall consist of all revenue credited pursuant to law, including any fund
transfers authorized by the Legislature.
(2) The fund shall only be used to pay the patrol's direct costs related
to administering, operating, and maintaining the Nebraska Public Safety
Communication System, except that (a) any unobligated money in the fund may
first be used to reduce the patrol's General Fund costs to operate the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System, and if additional unobligated money in the
fund exists, the Legislature may transfer money from the fund to the State Fire
Marshal and the Game and Parks Commission to reduce the General Fund costs to
operate the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System, and (b) transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature .
For fiscal year 2013-14, transfers may be made from the fund to the Nebraska
Capital Construction Fund at the direction of the Legislature to support
capital projects related to Nebraska State Patrol law enforcement efforts. Any
money in the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 203. Section 82-139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
82-139 The Support Nebraska History Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of money credited to the fund under section 60-3,256 and any other
gifts, bequests, grants, or other contributions or donations to the fund from
public or private entities. The Nebraska State Historical Society shall
administer and distribute the Support Nebraska History Cash Fund. The fund
shall be expended to promote the history of Nebraska on the Internet, to
support history education for children in Nebraska, and for costs directly
related to the administration of the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Support Nebraska History Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 204. Section 83-973, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-973 The Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund is created. The State
Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from the General Fund to the
Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund on or before July 15, 2021, on such date
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services. It is the intent of the Legislature that
these funds remain in the Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund until sufficient
-35-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
details are provided to the Legislature regarding plans to reduce prison
overcrowding, except that (1) the fund may be used for purposes of a study of
inmate classification within the Department of Correctional Services and (2)
transfers may be made to the General Fund or the Vocational and Life Skills
Programming Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Prison
Overcrowding Contingency Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 205. Section 84-612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-612 (1) There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund known
as the Cash Reserve Fund which shall be under the direction of the State
Treasurer. The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer funds from the Cash Reserve Fund to
the General Fund upon certification by the Director of Administrative Services
that the current cash balance in the General Fund is inadequate to meet current
obligations. Such certification shall include the dollar amount to be
transferred. Any transfers made pursuant to this subsection shall be reversed
upon notification by the Director of Administrative Services that sufficient
funds are available.
(3) In addition to receiving transfers from other funds, the Cash Reserve
Fund shall receive federal funds received by the State of Nebraska for
undesignated general government purposes, federal revenue sharing, or general
fiscal relief of the state.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million eight hundred
forty-one thousand dollars from the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund to the Cash
Reserve Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred sixty-six million six
hundred seventy-three thousand five hundred eighty dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(4) (6) No funds shall be transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to
fulfill the obligations created under the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act
unless the balance in the Cash Reserve Fund after such transfer will be at
least equal to five hundred million dollars.
(5) (7) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the School Safety and Security Fund as soon as
administratively possible after September 2, 2023, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(8) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Risk Loss Trust on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(9) The State Treasurer shall transfer eleven million three hundred twenty
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and Human Services
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but on or before June 30, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(10) The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred seventy-four million
five hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Perkins County
Canal Project Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(11) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million one hundred fifteen
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Public Safety Cash Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(12) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund
on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) (13) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million four hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Public
Safety Communication System Revolving Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before
June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(14) The State Treasurer shall transfer seventy million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(15) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
-36-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
Administrative Services.
(16) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Development Cash Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(17) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred forty million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund on or
after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(18) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
(19) The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred forty million dollars
from the General Fund to the Cash Reserve Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but
before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(7) (20) The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before June
30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(8) (21) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-nine million four
hundred fifty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund
to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before
June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(22) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred thousand
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Materiel Division Revolving Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(23) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Youth Outdoor Education Innovation Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(24) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-eight million dollars from
the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund to the Cash Reserve Fund on
or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(25) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the State Insurance Fund on or before July 10, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(9) (26) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and Human Services
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but on or before June 30, 2025, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(10) (27) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million two hundred
fifty thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the State Insurance Fund
as soon as possible after April 2, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
(28) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Fund on or after July 1,
2024, but before July 15, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(11) (29) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or before
June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(12) (30) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or after July 1,
2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(13) The State Treasurer shall transfer forty-five million eight hundred
ninety-seven thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska
Capital Construction Fund on or before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(14) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Self-Insured Liability Fund on or before June 30,
-37-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(15) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer two hundred million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Transformational Project Fund in
increments necessary to fund the distributions authorized in section 81-12,193,
beginning in fiscal year 2027-28 and continuing each fiscal year until such
distribution requirements are met.
(16) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred forty-seven million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(31) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer two hundred million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, if the balance of the Cash Reserve Fund on July
1, 2026, after accounting for the transfers in this section, does not fall
below sixteen percent of the amount appropriated, excluding encumbered and
certified reappropriations, from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026-27.
Sec. 206. Section 84-622, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-622 The State Treasurer shall transfer:
(1) To the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund by October 1, 2024, and on
or before June 30 of each year through June 30, 2025 2026, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services, (a) the first thirteen million
dollars of any interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June
30, 2026, on federal funds allocated to the State of Nebraska from the federal
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund pursuant to the federal American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 802, as amended, (b) the first twelve million
dollars of any interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June
30, 2025 2026, from the investment of money in the Perkins County Canal Project
Fund pursuant to section 61-305, and (c) the first five million dollars of any
interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2025 2026,
from the investment of money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund from
transfers credited to such fund that are designated for the construction of a
new state prison pursuant to section 72-1001; and
(2) To the Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund on or before June 30
of each year through June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services, the next seven million dollars of any interest
earned after the first twelve million dollars of interest earned on or after
July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2026, from the investment of money in
the Perkins County Canal Project Fund pursuant to section 61-305; and
(2) (3) To the Inland Port Authority Fund on or before June 30 of each
year through June 30, 2025 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services, (a) any interest earned after the first thirteen
million dollars of interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before
June 30, 2026, on federal funds allocated to the State of Nebraska from the
federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund pursuant to the federal American
Rescue Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 802, as amended, (b) any interest earned
after the first nineteen million dollars of interest earned on or after July 1,
2024, and on or before June 30, 2025 2026, from the investment of money in the
Perkins County Canal Project Fund pursuant to section 61-305, and (c) any
interest earned after the first five million dollars of interest earned on or
after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2025 2026, from the investment of
money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund from transfers credited to such
fund that are designated for the construction of a new state prison pursuant to
section 72-1001.
Sec. 207. Section 85-1643, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1643 (1) The Private Postsecondary Career Schools Cash Fund is created.
All fees collected pursuant to the Private Postsecondary Career School Act
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall
be used only for the purpose of administering the act, except that transfers
may be made from the fund to the Education Future Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. No fees shall be subject to refund.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, fees collected
pursuant to the act shall be the following:
(a) Initial application for authorization to operate, two hundred dollars
plus twenty dollars per program of study offered;
(b) Renewal application for authorization to operate, one hundred dollars
plus twenty dollars per program of study offered, except that the board may
establish a variable fee schedule based upon the prior school year's gross
tuition revenue as provided by the school pursuant to section 85-1656;
(c) Approval to operate a branch facility, one hundred dollars;
(d) Late submission of application, fifty dollars;
(e) Initial agent's permit, fifty dollars;
(f) Agent's permit renewal, twenty dollars;
(g) Accreditation or reaccreditation, one hundred dollars;
(h) Initial authorization to award an associate degree, one hundred
dollars;
(i) Significant program change, fifty dollars;
-38-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
(j) Change of name or location, twenty-five dollars; and
(k) Additional new program, one hundred dollars.
(3) Fees for out-of-state schools may include, but shall not exceed the
following:
(a) Certificate of approval to recruit, five hundred dollars annually;
(b) Initial agent's permit, one hundred dollars; and
(c) Agent's permit renewal, forty dollars.
(4)(a) The board shall consult with the advisory council established
pursuant to section 85-1607 regarding any increase in fees under the act.
Beginning with fiscal year 2006-07 and each year thereafter, the board in
consultation with the advisory council shall establish fees sufficient to cover
the total cost of administration, except that such fees shall not exceed one
hundred ten percent of the previous year's total cost. Such fees shall be set
out in the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board.
(b) Total cost of administration shall be determined by an annual audit
of:
(i) Salaries and benefits or portions thereof for those department
employees who administer the act;
(ii) Operating costs such as rent, utilities, and supplies;
(iii) Capital costs such as office equipment, computer hardware, and
computer software;
(iv) Costs for travel by employees of the department, including car
rental, gas, and mileage charges; and
(v) Other reasonable and necessary costs as determined by the board.
Sec. 208. Section 85-1654, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1654 The Tuition Recovery Cash Fund is hereby established. The fund
shall be a cash fund used to receive assessments imposed under section 85-1656
and to pay claims authorized under section 85-1657. Transfers may be made from
the fund to the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Tuition Recovery Cash Fund fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest earned
by the fund shall accrue to the fund.
Sec. 209. Section 85-2009, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-2009 (1) The Community College Gap Assistance Program Fund is created.
The fund shall be under the direction of the committee and shall be
administered by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education. The
fund shall consist of money received pursuant to section 79-3501, any other
money received by the state in the form of grants or gifts from nonfederal
sources, such other amounts as may be transferred or otherwise accrue to the
fund, and any investment income earned on the fund. The fund shall be used to
carry out the community college gap assistance program pursuant to the
Community College Gap Assistance Program Act. Transfers may be made from the
fund to the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Community College Gap Assistance Program Fund fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) In addition to community college gap assistance awarded to students,
money in the Community College Gap Assistance Program Fund may also be used by
the committee:
(a) To establish application and funding procedures; and
(b) To assist other eligible institutions as specified in contracts
entered into pursuant to subsection (4) of section 85-2010 in defraying the
costs of direct staff support services, including, but not limited to,
marketing, outreach, applications, interviews, and assessments related to the
community college gap assistance program.
(3) Each community college may use up to ten percent of any money received
from the fund to defray the costs of direct staff support services, including,
but not limited to, marketing, outreach, applications, interviews, and
assessments.
Sec. 210. Section 86-324, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-324 (1) The Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund is
hereby created. The fund shall provide the assistance necessary to make
universal access to telecommunications services available to all persons in the
state consistent with the policies set forth in the Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund Act. Only eligible telecommunications companies
designated by the commission shall be eligible to receive support to serve
high-cost areas from the fund. A telecommunications company that receives such
support shall use that support only for the provision, maintenance, and
upgrading of facilities and services for which the support is intended. Any
such support should be explicit and sufficient to achieve the purpose of the
act.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 86-124, in addition to other
provisions of the act, and to the extent not prohibited by federal law, the
commission:
(a) Shall have authority and power to subject eligible telecommunications
companies to service quality, customer service, and billing regulations. Such
regulations shall apply only to the extent of any telecommunications services
-39-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
or offerings made by an eligible telecommunications company which are eligible
for support by the fund. The commission shall be reimbursed from the fund for
all costs related to drafting, implementing, and enforcing the regulations and
any other services provided on behalf of customers pursuant to this
subdivision;
(b) Shall have authority and power to issue orders carrying out its
responsibilities and to review the compliance of any eligible
telecommunications company receiving support for continued compliance with any
such orders or regulations adopted pursuant to the act;
(c) May withhold all or a portion of the funds to be distributed from any
telecommunications company failing to continue compliance with the commission's
orders or regulations;
(d) Shall withhold support distributed from the fund from any
telecommunications company using or providing any communications equipment or
service deemed to pose a threat to national security identified on the Covered
List developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R. 1.50002, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2023, and published by the Public Safety and Homeland Security
Bureau of the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to the federal Secure
and Trusted Communications Networks Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., as
such act existed on January 1, 2023, and the rules adopted pursuant to such act
by the Federal Communications Commission on November 11, 2022, in its Report
and Order FCC 22-84. Any telecommunications company that removes, discontinues,
or replaces any communications equipment or service identified on the Covered
List described in this subdivision in compliance with federal law shall not be
required to obtain any additional permits from any state agency or political
subdivision in the removal, discontinuance, or replacement of such
communications equipment or service as long as the state agency or political
subdivision is properly notified of the necessary replacements and the
replacement of any communications equipment is similar to the existing
communications equipment;
(e) Shall require every telecommunications company to contribute to any
universal service mechanism established by the commission pursuant to state
law. The commission shall require, as reasonably necessary, an annual audit of
any telecommunications company to be performed by a third-party certified
public accountant to insure the billing, collection, and remittance of a
surcharge for universal service. The costs of any audit required pursuant to
this subdivision shall be paid by the telecommunications company being audited;
(f) Shall require an audit of information provided by a telecommunications
company to be performed by a third-party certified public accountant for
purposes of calculating universal service fund payments to such
telecommunications company. The costs of any audit required pursuant to this
subdivision shall be paid by the telecommunications company being audited; and
(g) May administratively fine pursuant to section 75-156 any person who
violates the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4)(a) Transfers may be made from earnings on the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund to the 211 Cash Fund or the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million two hundred seventy-
five thousand dollars on July 1, 2023, from the earnings on the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund to the 211 Cash Fund. The State
Treasurer shall transfer one million four hundred fifty-five thousand dollars
on July 1, 2024, from the earnings on the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal
Service Fund to the 211 Cash Fund.
(5) Until (c) Beginning October 1, 2024, through June 30, 2029 2027, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund remaining after transfers to the 211 Cash Fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 211. Section 86-1028, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1028 (1) The 911 Service System Fund is created. The fund shall consist
of surcharges collected pursuant to sections 86-457 and 86-904, money
transferred from the Enhanced Wireless 911 Fund, any federal funds received for
implementation and development of 911 service, and any other money designated
for credit to the 911 Service System Fund. The fund shall be used for the costs
of administering the fund, for the purposes specified in section 86-465 unless
otherwise directed by federal law with respect to any federal funds, and for
the purposes specified in the 911 Service System Act. The costs of
administering the 911 Service System Fund shall be kept to a minimum.
(2) The fund shall not be subject to any fiscal-year limitation or lapse
provision of unexpended balance at the end of any fiscal year or biennium. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning July 1, 2025, any investment
earnings from investment of money in , and for the period July 1, 2017, through
June 30, 2019, any interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the General
Fund.
(3) Money in the 911 Service System Fund may be used to pay for costs
incurred by or on behalf of governing bodies or public safety answering points
to provide 911 service that are determined by the commission to be eligible for
funding. The commission is not required to provide funding from the 911 Service
-40-

LB264 LB264
2025 2025
System Fund to more than one public safety answering point in any county. Each
entity that receives disbursements from the fund under this subsection shall
make a full accounting of the money in a manner and form prescribed by the
commission.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Enhanced Wireless
911 Fund on July 1, 2018, to the 911 Service System Fund.
Sec. 212. Sections 157 and 213 of this act become operative on July 1,
2025. The other sections of this act become operative on their effective date.
Sec. 213. Original section 72-2401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 214. Original sections 2-1577, 37-351, 39-2803, 39-2807, 48-1,116,
48-3405, 50-501, 57-1411, 60-3,201, 71-7608, 76-3219, 77-2911, 77-4310.03,
79-810, 79-1064, 79-1119, 79-1142, 79-1145, 79-2510, 79-3501, 81-179, 81-302,
81-407, 81-8,239.02, 81-1210.04, 81-1211, 81-1213.02, 81-1213.05, 81-1216,
81-12,174, 81-12,176, 81-12,177, 81-12,178, 81-12,182, 81-12,183, 81-12,184,
81-12,185, 81-12,186, 81-12,187, 81-12,189, 81-12,191, 81-12,193, 81-12,224,
81-12,238, 81-12,243, 81-12,245, 81-1329, 81-1558, 81-15,174, 81-15,300,
81-2004.07, 81-2004.08, 82-139, 83-973, 84-612, 84-622, 85-1643, 85-1654,
85-2009, 86-324, and 86-1028, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
sections 8-604, 9-1,101, 9-1107, 13-3315, 37-1017, 37-1804, 39-1390, 39-2806,
46-1,164, 55-901, 60-3,201.01, 60-1505, 60-1513, 61-218, 61-222, 61-305,
61-405, 66-2308, 68-996, 68-1010, 69-1317, 71-5328, 71-7611, 72-232.02, 72-820,
72-1001, 72-2211, 75-1101, 77-4025, and 77-6841, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 215. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
81-829.10, 81-1214, 81-1215, 81-1217, 81-1218, 81-1219, 81-12,232, 81-12,233,
81-12,234, 81-12,235, 81-12,236, 81-12,237, and 81-12,244, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 216. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed
and approved according to law.
-41-